   Skip to main content Menu
   The Trade Desk
     * About
          + Leadership
          + Partners
          + Press Releases
          + Industry Initiatives
          + Investor Relations
     * Products
          + Advertising Channels
          + Connected TV Advertising
          + Audio Advertising
          + Mobile Advertising
          + Native Advertising
          + Video Advertising
          + Planning & Buying Tools
          + Planner
          + Koa™ Artificial Intelligence
          + Data Management Platform
          + Cross-Device Targeting
          + Inventory & Marketplaces
          + Enterprise Solutions
          + Enterprise API™
     * Insights
          + All
          + Trends
          + Success Stories
          + Media Coverage
     * Careers
          + Jobs
     * Trading Academy

     * Contact Us
     * Log In

   ____________________ (BUTTON) Search
   English
     * 中文 (简体)

   ____________________ (BUTTON) Search

Privacy and The Trade Desk Platform

   Adbrain is now a part of the Trade Desk Platform.
   This page is about privacy for our Trade Desk Platform and the data it
   uses for delivering advertising. If you are interested in our corporate
   and website privacy policy, click here.

   Last updated: 29 August 2019

   Overview

   At A Glance

   Full Privacy Policy

   The Platform

   The data the Platform collects and processes

   How the Platform collects data

   Cookies

   The purposes for which the Platform processes data

   More about Personalisation

   European Union controller/processor designation and legal bases

   Sharing and Transfer

   The EU-U.S. and Swiss-U.S. Privacy Shield Frameworks

   Security and data retention

   Your choices – control over data

   Your Data Rights

   Changes to our policies

   Contact Us

Overview

   The Trade Desk offers what is known in the industry as a Demand Side
   Platform (DSP). In simple terms this means we provide technology that
   helps advertisers and their advertising agencies manage digital
   advertising campaigns across many channels, such as websites, apps,
   audio, smart tvs, and other video. The ads our clients buy help pay for
   the content you enjoy.

   We, and our clients, collect and use data both to help ensure that the
   ads you see are relevant and to measure and report on their
   effectiveness.

   Our AdBrain product, which is part of our Platform, uses data to
   produce a mapping of devices that might be related to each other,
   meaning that they might be used by the same person or by people in the
   same household. This helps advertisers better target and measure their
   campaigns, as well as to try to limit the number of times the same
   person or household sees an ad.

   Data that is in our Platform is pseudonymous, which means that it does
   not directly identify people. So, our Platform doesn’t have names,
   email addresses, phone numbers, or the like, and we prohibit clients
   and partners from putting that kind of data into our Platform. Our
   clients and partners may, outside of our Platform, have access to other
   information about you, including information that directly identifies
   you. Such information is governed by the clients’ own legal
   requirements, privacy policies, contracts, or other terms that they
   have in place.

   By the term “Platform”, we mean The Trade Desk’s own advertising
   technology platform and systems. Our references to our Platform do not
   include the technology or systems of clients or partners that use, or
   integrate with us. They are bound by our policies when they use our
   Platform.

   The Trade Desk is a member of the Network Advertising Initiative(NAI)
   (http://www.networkadvertising.org) and adheres to the NAI’s 2018 Code
   of Conduct. The Trade Desk also follows the industry self-regulatory
   guidelines of the Digital Advertising Alliance (http://aboutads.info),
   the Digital Advertising Alliance of Canada (https://youradchoices.ca),
   and the European Digital Advertising Alliance (
   http://youronlinechoices.com).

   The Trade Desk also implements and adheres to the policies of the IAB
   EU Transparency & Consent Framework as part of our compliance with EU
   data protection law. See http://advertisingconsent.eu for more
   information.

   If you want to go directly to our Opt Out, please
   visit http://www.adsrvr.org.

At A Glance

   Read the table for a quick overview. See below the table for detailed
   information.

   Who we are:

   Email: privacy ((at)) thetradedesk ((dot)) com

   Global HQ:
   The Trade Desk, Inc.
   42 N. Chestnut St
   Ventura, CA 93001
   USA

   EEA and Switzerland:
   The UK Trade Desk Ltd.
   10th Floor, 1 Bartholomew Close
   London EC1A 7BL
   United Kingdom

   What we do:

   Advertising technology platform for managing digital advertising
   campaigns.

   The data our Platform collects and processes:

   Pseudonymous data such as:
     * unique cookie and device identifiers
     * mobile device advertising identifiers
     * IP addresses
     * web browsing history from advertising impressions we see
     * interest information inferred by us from web browsing history
     * interest information stored and/or used on the Platform by clients
       and partners
     * location information
     * browser and device type, version and settings

   How the Platform collects data:

   Some of the ways the Platform collects data include:
     * from partners sending us requests for ads on websites, mobile
       applications, smart televisions, video devices, and other media
     * using cookies and pixels
     * from clients and partners uploading data to our platform
     * from clients and partners using our technology to collect data

   The purposes for which the Platform processes data:

   The Platform processes data both on our behalf and on behalf of clients
   and partners for advertising purposes such as:
     * personalizing ads
     * delivering ads
     * limiting the number of times you see an ad
     * measuring effectiveness of ads
     * reporting on ad campaigns
     * maintaining ad transaction records
     * attributing purchases or other actions to ads
     * associating devices that might be related to each other
     * preventing malicious or invalid activity

   Sharing and transfer:

   We share data with other parties such as:
     * clients and partners to help improve the effectiveness of their,
       and their clients’ advertising
     * if we think it is required by law

   In addition, a lot of the data collected on the Platform belongs to our
   clients and partners. They, of course, are able to remove such data
   from the Platform.

   We may transfer data from the country of origin to the US or other
   countries. We do so under a valid legal framework, such as Privacy
   Shield.

   We may also disclose personal information in response to lawful
   requests from public authorities, including to meet security or law
   enforcement requirements.

   Security and Data Retention:

   We maintain generally accepted security methods to protect data on the
   Platform.

   We retain pseudonymous data up to 18 months before we aggregate it.

   Your rights and choices:

   You have rights and choices with respect to the personal data on the
   Platform.

Full Privacy Policy

   Below, we explain in detail the type of data we collect, how we collect
   it, how we use it, and how we disclose it, as well as the choices
   available to you. Please keep in mind that the digital advertising
   industry is extremely complex, so we can’t present every technical
   detail. If, after reading this policy, you still have questions, please
   feel free to contact us at privacy ((at) thetradedesk ((dot)) com.

The Platform

   The Platform allows advertisers and advertising agencies to manage
   digital advertising campaigns. It is a Demand Side Platform because we
   represent the demand side of the digital advertising marketplace, in
   which advertisers and agencies with ads to display are the “demand” and
   publishers with space for such ads on web pages, apps, smart TVs and
   other properties are the “supply”.

   Digital advertising uses data to make ads more effective and to measure
   their effectiveness. Without data our advertiser clients wouldn’t know,
   for example, if 100 different users each saw an ad, or if one user saw
   the same ad 100 times. This data is crucial to online and mobile
   content. Without data like this, advertisers would pay publishers much
   less, forcing publishers to either show more ads or make users pay for
   their content.

   Advertisers and their agencies collect and use data on the Platform in
   different ways. They may bring their own data to the Platform. They
   collect data using the Platform. And they can remove their data from
   the Platform. We contractually prohibit them from having data that
   directly identifies individuals, such as names, email addresses, phone
   numbers, and the like on the Platform. Instead, data on the Platform is
   what we call pseudonymous, as described further below.

The data the Platform collects and processes

   The Platform collects and processes pseudonymous – i.e. not directly
   identifying – data about users, devices, and ads and where they’re
   shown. This includes:
     * unique cookie identifiers
     * mobile device advertising identifiers
     * IP addresses
     * interest information stored and/or used on the platform by clients
       and partners
     * interest information we create
     * other information about browsers and devices, such as type, version
       and settings
     * location information based on IP address or latitude/longitude
       coordinates, if provided to us
     * information about ads that are shown, such as which ads are shown
       to a device or user, where (which web page or app) they are shown,
       and at what time

How the Platform collects data

   The Platform receives data in several ways, including the following:
     * Bid requests, which are sets of information that describe an ad
       space that is available to be filled. We get these requests from
       the “supply” side of the advertising ecosystem, meaning websites,
       apps, smart televisions, and others, as well as their agents. The
       requests contain information about the ad space, the device, and
       sometimes the user, including location information. They also
       usually have an ID that enables us to match the request with
       information we may already have.
     * Purveyors of connected TV devices and apps can send us
       information about the video content viewed on the device or app.
     * Pixels and cookies, which allow us to recognize web browsers across
       sites and over time, and therefore to record information about them
       over time.
     * Mobile device IDs, which are provided by the device operating
       systems, like Apple’s iOS and Google’s Android, for purposes of
       allowing mobile apps and their advertising partners to recognize a
       device over time. We use these IDs the same way we use cookies, but
       for mobile apps instead of browsers.
     * Mobile SDKs are bits of code that some of our partners enable to be
       placed in mobile apps. This enables our partners to send us data
       about the mobile app and device in association with the mobile
       device ID.

Cookies

   The Platform uses cookies for the advertising related purposes
   described in this policy.

   Our cookie domain is adsrvr.org. Cookies help us by enabling us to
   distinguish between, recognize, and store data about unique web
   browsers and devices, and to store data on our servers for the
   advertising purposes described here. We also use non-unique cookies to
   store cookie-based opt-out choices, when users opt out.

   In order to be able to transmit requests for ads, and other data about
   users or devices, between sellers and buyers, and to help show you ads
   that match your likely interests, we engage in cookie syncing, meaning
   that we match our cookie IDs to clients’ and partners’ cookie IDs.

The purposes for which the Platform processes data

   The Platform processes data both on our own behalf and on behalf of
   clients and partners for purposes related to the targeting, delivering,
   and measuring of and reporting on advertising.
     * Personalizing ads makes sure they are relevant and effective.
     * Delivering ads includes, for example, making sure the ad gets
       shown, keeping track of how many times it’s shown, as well as where
       and when.
     * Measurement and analytics includes tracking how well ads perform,
       such as whether users clicked or went to a client’s store after
       their ad campaign was shown.
     * Reporting on ad campaigns includes compilations of measurement,
       attribution, and other data to report on the performance and
       success of campaigns, as well as transaction reporting and
       verification.
     * Clicks and conversions measure actions taken by a user with respect
       to a particular ad, i.e., a click on an ad, or a download of an
       app.
     * Attribution means matching particular ad views to
       subsequent actions taken by a user. For example, a car advertiser
       might be able to see that someone who saw an ad for a car four
       times, purchased that car. This would be done by stitching together
       data collected from our Platform with the advertiser’s own data and
       data from other companies. When this is done, we don’t get any data
       that allows us to directly identify the purchaser of the car.
     * Cross device graphing uses algorithms to associate devices that
       might be related to each other, such as devices used by the same
       person or in the same household.
     * Malicious or invalid activity can be a problem for companies and
       users. For example, we process information in an attempt to
       identify and prevent purveyors of malware or bots that try to take
       advertising dollars for ads that aren’t shown to real users or that
       try to harm users’ devices.

More about Personalisation

   Sometimes, as part of our Platform, we create and use user profiles
   associated with unique IDs. This means that we look at the information
   associated with the IDs, and with the requests for ads, such as the
   content in which the ad is shown, the time, the geographic location,
   and the type of device. Sometimes we also use information about whether
   or how users responded to ads to find other users who would respond to
   ads. We apply various computational methods on this information to find
   groupings of IDs that may have certain interests or characteristics,
   such as “clothing,” “sports,” “travel,” “male,” “25-54,” and so on. Our
   Platform also enables data suppliers to bring data to the Platform that
   our clients can use on the Platform to improve their ad campaigns.

   Clients can bring their own data to the Platform for their own
   personalisation. Their sources and methods for acquiring this data
   vary, and are subject to our clients’ own policies and legal
   obligations, but we do contractually prohibit certain types of data
   from being introduced onto the Platform, such as directly identifying
   data or sensitive data.

   As required under the NAI Code, The Trade Desk discloses standard
   interest segments that are based on health related information or
   interests that it makes available in the Platform where permitted by
   law and self-regulatory rules.

   Data that is considered sensitive or in special categories according to
   local rules, including data about children, is subject to
   restrictions on the Platform. Our contracts prohibit clients and
   partners from using data on the Platform that is from or about users
   that they know are children or that is considered sensitive or
   special. And we do not knowingly use such data on the Platform.

European Union controller/processor designation and legal bases

   If you are based in the European Economic Area (EEA) or Switzerland,
   The UK Trade Desk Ltd. is responsible for processing your personal
   information. Under the definitions of “Controller” and “Processor” in
   EU law, this processing is in some cases as a Controller of data and in
   some cases as a Processor. Trade Desk are a Controller, for example,
   over personalised user interest segments that we create for our
   Platform, when we have appropriate permissions.

   When we collect data for personalisation from requests for ads that we
   receive as described above, under EU law, we will use consent as our
   legal basis for doing so.

   We process data for other purposes when we have a legitimate interest
   in doing so and that interest is not outweighed by the rights or
   freedoms of individual data subjects.

Sharing and Transfer

   We share data with other parties in some circumstances
     * Some of the data processed on the Platform belongs to our clients.
       When this is the case, our clients can take this data, such as
       records of advertising impressions, off of the Platform.
     * We share pseudonymous IDs that we think might be related to other
       pseudonymous IDs with clients and partners that use our AdBrain
       product.
     * Some of our clients and partners receive ad request data through
       the Platform for advertising purposes.
     * We may share data in order to investigate or prevent reasonably
       suspected malicious activity, fake traffic, or other activity that
       may be harmful to us or our clients.
     * We may use service providers that store or process data on our
       behalf.
     * We may transfer data to a successor entity in connection with a
       corporate merger, consolidation, sale of assets, bankruptcy, or
       other corporate change.
     * We may share aggregated data that does not include individual-level
       records with any party or publicly.
     * We may disclose personal data in response to lawful requests by
       public authorities, including to meet national security or law
       enforcement requirements.

   We transfer personal data to countries other than the country in which
   it was collected. We do so under a valid legal framework, such as a
   Privacy Shield. If we receive data under the Privacy Shield and
   transfer it on to a third party acting as an agent on our behalf, we
   will remain liable under the Privacy Shield Principles for that third
   party’s processing of the data.

The EU-U.S. and Swiss-U.S. Privacy Shield Frameworks

   We transfer data from the EU or Switzerland to the US under our Privacy
   Shield certification. If there is any conflict between the terms in
   this Policy and the Privacy Shield Principles, the Privacy Shield
   Principles shall govern.

   Under the Privacy Shield, we commit to resolve complaints about our
   collection or use of your personal data, and are subject to enforcement
   by the US Federal Trade Commission. EU and Swiss individuals with
   inquiries or complaints regarding our Privacy Shield policy should
   first contact us at privacy ((at)) thetradedesk ((dot)) com or at the
   address listed in the “Contact” section of this Policy. If you have
   unresolved privacy or data use concerns that we have not addressed
   satisfactorily, please contact our U.S. based third-party dispute
   resolution provider (free of charge) at
   https://feedback-form.truste.com/watchdog/request.

   Under certain conditions specified by the Privacy Shield Principles,
   you may also be able to invoke binding arbitration to resolve your
   complaint. Please click here for more information or to submit a
   complaint.

   You may have certain legal rights with respect to data transferred
   under the Privacy Shield Framework. See YOUR DATA RIGHTS below.

Security and data retention

   We retain the pseudonymous data collected on our Platform for up to 18
   months. After 18 months (often sooner) the data is aggregated and
   stored for up to 3 additional years. This retention policy does not
   apply to client or partner data.

   We have implemented security measures, including physical, electronic
   and administrative safeguards, to prevent the unauthorized access to,
   loss, misuse, or alteration of the information that our Platform
   collects. We believe these measures are appropriate given the nature of
   the data and our systems, but we make no assurances in this policy
   about our ability to prevent any such event or the possible harm to you
   or any third party that could arise from it.

Your choices – control over data

   Industry opt-out pages. The online advertising industry provides
   websites from which you may opt out of interest-based advertising from
   the Trade Desk and other companies that participate in industry
   self-regulatory programs. The US-based opt out pages
   are www.aboutads.info/choices and www.networkadvertising.org/choices.
   The European based page is www.youronlinechoices.com. In Canada, use
   youradchoices.ca/choices.

    For mobile apps. You can opt out of the Trade Desk using information
   about your usage of mobile apps that are targeted to your interests by
   using your device settings, for most devices. We are not able to
   directly access the Mobile App Opt Out on devices that offer it. To
   learn how to use the mobile app opt out, consult your device
   instructions. To find information on Opting out on Mobile Devices
   please visit  http://www.networkadvertising.org/mobile-choice</a>

    The Trade Desk’s Data Control Page. You are able to opt out of having
   new data associated with your device and to request that we
   disassociate from your device data we already have. You can directly
   access The Trade Desk’s opt out, which will cease data collection and
   disassociate data from your device, by visiting  http://www.adsrvr.org.

Your Data Rights

   Individuals in the EEA and Switzerland may have certain legal rights
   with respect to data the Trade Desk collects and processes in
   association with your device. These rights include the right of access,
   deletion and correction of personal data. These rights may be limited,
   for example if fulfilling your request would reveal personal data about
   another person, where they would infringe the rights of a third party
   (including our rights) or if you ask us to delete information which we
   are required by law to keep or have compelling legitimate interests in
   keeping. Relevant exemptions are included in both the GDPR and local
   implementing legislation. We will inform you of relevant exemptions we
   rely upon when responding to any request you make.

   To make a request to exercise any of these rights in respect of data
   for which the Trade Desk is Data Controller, please email dsr ((at))
   thetradedesk ((dot)) com.

Changes to our policies

   We may revise this policy at any time. However, if we make material
   changes, we will not apply them retroactively.

Contact Us

   You may contact us regarding privacy.

   Email: privacy ((at)) thetradedesk ((dot)) com

   Global Data Protection Officer (DPO)
   The Trade Desk, Global Privacy Office
   2 Park Avenue, 5th Floor
   New York, NY 10016
   Email: dpo ((at)) thetradedesk ((dot)) com

   If you have a concern regarding our privacy practices, please contact
   us via the contacts above. If after reasonable efforts you believe your
   concern has not been satisfactorily addressed by us:
     * In the US, our privacy practices are regulated by the Federal Trade
       Commission.
     * In the EU or Switzerland, for concerns that pertain to the transfer
       of data from the EU or Switzerland under the EU-US or Swiss-US
       Privacy Shield Frameworks, please contact our U.S. based
       third-party dispute resolution provider (free of charge) at
       https://feedback-form.truste.com/watchdog/request.
     * Otherwise, in the EU, we recommend you contact the Information
       Commissioner’s Office (ICO) of the United Kingdom.

   Top
     * About
     * Products
     * Insights
     * Careers
     * Trading Academy

   ©2019 The Trade Desk. All rights reserved. | Website Privacy Policy |
   Services Privacy Policy | Opt-Out
     * Facebook
     * Twitter
     * LinkedIn
     * Instagram
     * YouTube

   IAB Digital Advertising Alliance
   Skip to main content Menu
   The Trade Desk
     * About
          + Leadership
          + Partners
          + Press Releases
          + Industry Initiatives
          + Investor Relations
     * Products
          + Advertising Channels
          + Connected TV Advertising
          + Audio Advertising
          + Mobile Advertising
          + Native Advertising
          + Video Advertising
          + Planning & Buying Tools
          + Planner
          + Koa™ Artificial Intelligence
          + Data Management Platform
          + Cross-Device Targeting
          + Inventory & Marketplaces
          + Enterprise Solutions
          + Enterprise API™
     * Insights
          + All
          + Trends
          + Success Stories
          + Media Coverage
     * Careers
          + Jobs
     * Trading Academy

     * Contact Us
     * Log In

   ____________________ (BUTTON) Search
   English
     * 中文 (简体)

   ____________________ (BUTTON) Search

Privacy Policy

   TRUSTe

   The Trade Desk is committed to protecting consumer privacy and
   respecting your right to choice as it relates to advertising and the
   data used to help serve ads relevant to those consumers. The Trade Desk
   is a technology company that helps advertisers connect with consumers
   who are interested in, or could benefit from, the advertisers’
   products. Protecting consumer privacy is a top priority to The Trade
   Desk. See below for our complete Privacy Policy. You can go directly to
   the section of the Privacy Policy that you want to read:

   · The Trade Desk Services Privacy Practices

   · Privacy Practices for Our Website

   Consumer Opt-Out Choices

   The Trade Desk Services: If you would prefer not to have The Trade Desk
   serve you relevant ads, you may go to our opt-out page to learn more:
   Opt Out of Relevant Advertising. If you opt out through this page, you
   may continue to see ads from The Trade Desk, but these ads will not be
   targeted based on your online activity history. For more information on
   The Trade Desk services and our practices, please see below.

   Third Parties on The Trade Desk Website: We may allow certain third
   parties to collect data about your web viewing behavior on The Trade
   Desk website and combine this data with information collected from
   other websites over time for purposes that include interest-based
   advertising. If you would like to learn more about this type of
   advertising, or would prefer to opt-out of interest-based advertising,
   U.S. residents may visit www.aboutads.info/choices or
   www.networkadverising.org/choices, European residents may visit
   www.youronlinechoices.com, and Canadian residents may visit
   http://youradchoices.ca/choices/. For more information on The Trade
   Desk website practices, please see below.

   Commitment to Industry Self-Regulation: The Trade Desk follows the
   Digital Advertising Alliance (“DAA”) Self-Regulatory Principles and
   adheres to the Network Advertising Initiative (“NAI”) Code of Conduct
   as a member of NAI. Click here if you would like further information
   regarding the DAA principles and here if you would like information
   about the NAI Code of Conduct. Consistent with these principles, the
   health/fitness related segments available in The Trade Desk for
   behavioral advertising can be viewed here.

   The Trade Desk also adheres to the European Interactive Digital
   Advertising Alliance’s (“EDAA”) principles. You can learn more and opt
   out of behavioral advertising here.

   Further, The Trade Desk follows the Canadian Self-Regulatory Principles
   for Online Behavioural Advertising’s (“DAAC”) principles. You can learn
   more and opt out of behavioral advertising here. Please contact
   [email protected] for any questions about The Trade Desk privacy,
   security, and data practices. Please see below for our complete Privacy
   Policy.

   The Trade Desk Services Privacy Practices

   Posted: September 30th, 2016, Effective Date: September 30th, 2016.

   For the prior versions of the privacy policy, please click here and
   here.

Contents

   BACKGROUND REGARDING OUR TECHNOLOGY AND SERVICES

   PRIVACY PRACTICES FOR OUR TECHNOLOGY

   How We Use Information Our Technology Collects

   Cookies, Web Beacons and Mobile SDKs

   Information Sharing

   Interest-Based Advertising and Opting Out

   Opting Out on iOS Devices Such as iPhones, iPads or iPods

   Opting Out on Android Devices

   Data Storage and Security

   Changes To Our Policy

   International Transfers and Safe Harbor

   Contacting Us

   PRIVACY PRACTICES FOR OUR WEBSITE

   Information We Collect On Our Website

   Communications From The Site

   Who We Share PII With

   Third Party Websites

   Updating / Deleting your PII

   Data Retention

   Security

   Automatic Data Collection

   Testimonials

   Changes To This Privacy Policy

   Contact Us

   BACKGROUND REGARDING OUR TECHNOLOGY AND SERVICES.

   The Trade Desk, Inc. (“we”, “us”, or “our”) provides an online
   advertising and technology platform and we are headquartered in the
   United States. We provide this privacy policy to inform you about how
   we collect and use data on our corporate website, which is located at
   www.thetradedesk.com (the “Website”), and how our technology platform
   and related technology, such as pixels` (“Technology”) processes
   information on behalf of online advertisers, website owners, data
   providers and other businesses that use our services (those online
   advertisers and their agencies who use our technology are defined as
   our “Clients”). If you have any questions about this privacy policy,
   please feel free to contact us at [email protected]. The Trade Desk
   runs a buying platform for media and data. The Trade Desk Technology
   allows our Clients to buy ad space on websites, in apps, and on other
   digital platforms, and allows for the use of proprietary and third
   party data in the purchase of that ad space. When ad space is bought or
   sold digitally (usually to an advertiser or ad agency by a publisher or
   other content provider) the Technology, fulfills the transaction by
   delivering the ad to internet and mobile users who visit that site, use
   that application, or watch certain videos (for example). Generally, an
   Internet user’s computer, browser or device comes into contact with The
   Trade Desk when a user views an ad delivered or serviced by or with our
   Technology. Serving users relevant advertising is sometimes referred to
   as interest based advertising or online behavioral advertising (“OBA”).

   PRIVACY PRACTICES FOR OUR TECHNOLOGY

   Information Our Technology Collects. We believe that consumers prefer
   more (rather than less) relevant ads, tailored to their interests. To
   do this, we collect a variety of data from Clients, from data
   suppliers, and across platforms, to help optimize ads and increase the
   likelihood that a particular unique, but pseudonymous, user will be
   interested in (rather than potentially annoyed by) an ad shown. For
   more information on the technology used to collect the below
   information, please refer to the below section titled “Cookies, Web
   Beacons and Mobile SDKs.”

   • Our Technology collects information generally known as non-personally
   identifiable information (“Non-PII”) that may include, but is not
   limited to, your IP host address, the date and time of the ad request,
   specific location information of your device (which may be derived
   from, for example, your device’s GPS, Bluetooth, or WiFi signals),
   pages viewed, browser type, the referring URL, Internet Service
   Provider, and your computer’s operating system, as well as how you
   interact with a web page or ad. We may also collect Non-PII such as
   age, gender, income, education, interests, and usage activity from
   Clients or other third parties. We also may collect analogous Non-PII
   from mobile platforms, which may include information about your
   interactions with those applications (including your IP address and
   time-stamp information), and information about your mobile device
   (including device type, handset name, operating system information,
   mobile identifiers such as Apple IDFA and Android Advertising ID,
   app-specific identifiers, and a list of the applications your device
   interacts with).

   • Sometimes, we obtain the above information from other ad platforms,
   application platforms or providers, customers or websites and services
   (including our Clients). We may work with Clients or other third
   parties to synchronize or “sync” unique, pseudonymous identifiers to
   match our Clients’ Non-PII data or identifiers to our own, in order to
   enhance data points about a particular unique browser or device, and
   thus enable or send ads that are more relevant, match consumers to
   their likely product interests, or better synchronize, cap, or
   otherwise optimize advertising.

How We Use Information Our Technology Collects

   The Trade Desk uses Non-PII to target and serve or to help our Clients
   to target and serve relevant advertising to consumers and to perform
   attribution analysis or other analytics regarding advertising
   audiences, as well as to compile, match and link audiences on behalf of
   Clients. For instance, we may, or help our Clients to, use this Non-PII
   to:

   • Determine what ad to show a consumer, and customize ads to particular
   types of audiences;

   • Customize ads to the type of web page users are viewing;

   • Limit the number of times a consumer sees an ad or a type of ad;

   • Perform analysis of how effective the ads are;

   • Help advertisers learn more about their own consumers;

   • Troubleshooting; and

   • Fraud detection

   Sometimes we may use or make available to Clients products or services
   from third parties that utilize their data and the Non-PII we collect
   or receive (such as IP Address) to recognize users or try to resolve a
   commonality of users (or households) across platforms or across
   devices, such as smartphones, computers, tablets or related browsers or
   to connect app usage to browser usage on the same device. For instance,
   we might infer that a common IP address seen across different devices
   represents a common user (or a related or similar user), and use that
   inference in tailoring ads. Occasionally, we receive data sets (which
   may constitute hashed or obfuscated personally identifiable information
   (“PII”)), in order to promote, test or validate the accuracy of such
   inferences.

   We do not knowingly collect or obtain from third parties, any personal
   data, including any “sensitive personal data,” for OBA purposes, as
   defined under Directive 95/46/EC, and we contractually prohibit third
   parties from putting this data in our platform.

   In adherence to EDAA requirements, we do not create segments for OBA
   purposes that are specifically designed to target children (age 12 and
   under). While this does not mean that ad delivery will not occur, it
   means that we will not specifically target ads to children ages 12 and
   under.

Cookies, Web Beacons and Mobile SDKs

   In order to help make the online advertisements more relevant to users,
   our Technology uses the standard “cookies” feature of major browser
   applications that allows us to store a small piece of data on users’
   computers about users’ visits to certain websites. We also use cookies
   to understand users’ browsing and buying activities so that we can
   measure the success of online advertising campaigns we run.

   Cookies are small text files that web servers typically send to users’
   computer when they visit a website. Cookies are stored as text files on
   users’ hard drive, and can be accessed by web servers when the user
   visits a website or views an advertisement. Cookies are used by
   companies to collect and send information about a user’s website visits
   – for example, number of visits, average time spent, pages viewed,
   navigation history through the website, and other statistics. This
   information helps companies improve a user’s online experience in many
   ways: for example, by allowing companies to monitor website
   performance, making the website easier to use, measuring the
   effectiveness of their promotional placements, and tailoring their
   website (including the ads and offers they receive) to better match a
   user’s interests and preferences. Users who prefer not to accept
   cookies can set their Internet browser to block cookies.

   The Trade Desk cookie is set to expire after one year; our opt-out
   cookie lasts longer. Our cookie expiration may reset upon further
   interaction between ourselves (or as applicable a Client) and a browser
   or device.

   The Trade Desk also uses web beacons (also known as 1×1 gifs), along
   with cookies, to determine if a user has visited a particular website.
   These beacons aid in providing more relevant advertising to the user,
   as well measuring the success of an advertising campaign, but provide
   no personally identifiable information.

   HTML5 and Locally Stored Objects. Similar to cookies are pieces of code
   known as “locally stored objects,” which we may also use for storing
   Non-PII. Locally stored objects, such as HTML5 Web Storage, are used
   for similar purposes as cookies but typically contain a greater amount
   and different types of data than browser cookies. Most current versions
   of common web browsers clear this locally stored data when you delete
   or clear your cookie cache. To confirm whether this is the case for the
   browser you are using, or to learn more about how to precisely control
   this data storage, please consult the Help function of your browser.

   Mobile Device Identifiers and SDKs. We may sometimes work with Clients
   that use mobile SDKs to collect information. A mobile SDK is the mobile
   app version of a pixel tag or beacon (see those descriptions, above).
   The SDK is a bit of computer code that app developers can include in
   their apps to enable ads to be shown, data to be collected, and related
   services to be implemented. We may use this technology, or work with
   others who use this technology, to deliver certain advertising through
   mobile applications and browsers based on information associated with
   mobile devices. If you’d like to opt-out from having ads tailored to
   you in this way on your mobile device, please follow the instructions
   in the “Choices” section below.

Information Sharing

   The Trade Desk may share the Non-PII that we collect and receive in
   various ways.

   • Primarily, we work with Clients and other third parties to help
   optimize ads and make them more likely to be relevant to consumers, by
   comparing, syncing and sharing the Non-PII described above. For
   instance, we may share to other ad platforms, customers or websites and
   services (including our Clients) Non-PII we have collected (generally,
   unique, pseudonymous identifiers representing consumers’ browsers), in
   order for these third parties to match their unique identifiers to our
   own, so that we can “sync” identifiers in order to help them show more
   relevant ads, match consumers to their likely interests, or better
   synchronize, cap, or otherwise optimize advertising.

   • Further, the Non-PII we collect and receive may be processed on our
   behalf by third-party service providers that assist us in running our
   business, including providers of data storage and processing
   facilities.

   • We may disclose your information to third parties when we reasonably
   believe we are obligated to do so by law, and in order to investigate,
   prevent, or take action regarding suspected or actual activities that
   may harm any person, our company, the Technology, or otherwise violate
   any law.

   • Also, in the event The Trade Desk is merged into another company, or
   another company acquires all or substantially all of The Trade Desk’s
   assets, including, without limitation, in the event of bankruptcy, all
   data compiled or owned by The Trade Desk may be among the items
   transferred in that transaction.

   • We may share non-personal information with Clients, both in an
   aggregated and non-aggregated form, in connection with reporting and
   accounting needs as well as with other unaffiliated third parties for
   various purposes such as statistical or educational analysis (such as
   the creation of predictive models).

   • Finally, disclosure of information may be required in response to
   lawful requests by public authorities, for example to meet national
   security or law enforcement requirements.

Interest-Based Advertising and Opting Out

   The Trade Desk uses cookies, Web beacons, pixels and other technologies
   to collect web viewing data across non-affiliated sites over time. In
   addition, The Trade Desk collects app usage data across non-affiliated
   apps over time. We may also collect such Web viewing and app usage data
   from other ad platforms, application platforms or providers, customers
   or websites and services (including our Clients) and we may combine
   this information with any information that we have collected about you.
   We use this data to infer your interests and to provide more relevant
   advertising to you. This is known as Interest-Based Advertising
   (“IBA”).

   We may also facilitate our Clients’ efforts to place a cookie or other
   tracking technology on a website with which our Client has a
   relationship, and we may allow our Clients to collect information about
   your web viewing behavior on our website. This information may be
   combined with other data collected from other websites over time for
   IBA purposes.

   The Trade Desk follows the Digital Advertising Alliance (“DAA”)
   Self-Regulatory Principles and the Network Advertising Initiative
   (“NAI”) Code of Conduct.

   Opting Out for Web-based IBA: If you’d like to opt-out from having The
   Trade Desk use your Web viewing data and other Non-PII for web-based
   IBA purposes, please click here for more information on IBA and the
   choices that The Trade Desk offers with respect to IBA. The DAA and NAI
   also provide websites where you can learn more about IBA and opt out of
   receiving targeted ads from our advertising partners who participate in
   the DAA or NAI programs. You can access these websites at
   www.aboutads.info/choices and at www.networkadvertising.org/choices.
   Residents of the EEA and Switzerland may visit
   www.youronlinechoices.com.If you are located in Canada, you can access
   this information at http://youradchoices.ca/choices/.

   Opting Out for App-based IBA: If you are using a mobile device, you may
   be able to opt out of receiving IBA by The Trade Desk based on app
   usage data, through your device settings as described below. We provide
   the following descriptions solely for informational purposes. For
   additional information and up to date methods of opting out, you should
   consult your device settings, and instructions provided by device
   manufacturers. Additional information can be found at
   https://www.networkadvertising.org/understanding-online-advertising/wha
   t-are-my-options.

Opting Out on iOS Devices Such as iPhones, iPads or iPods

   If you have an Apple device, you can opt out of our IBA services by
   updating to iOS 6.0 or higher, and setting Limit Ad Tracking to ‘ON’.
   You can do this by clicking on Settings -> General -> About ->
   Advertising and toggling Limit Ad Tracking to ‘ON’. Our systems are
   designed to respect your choice and not use information to provide IBA
   when this setting is ON. Again, you should consult Apple’s support web
   pages and instructions for the most current applicable settings.

Opting Out on Android Devices

   If you have an Android device and would like to opt out of our IBA
   services, you may do this as follows:

   1. Open the Google Settings app on your device

   2. Select Personal info & privacy à Ads settings à Manage Ad Settings

   3. Turn to “off” the “Ads based on your interests” option.

   Our systems are likewise designed to respect these choices transmitted
   by your Android device. Again, however, please consult Google’s
   settings and instructions for the most current settings information.

   Please note that these settings do not block ads, but rather will not
   base ads on your interests.

Data Storage and Security

   We retain the Non-PII collected via our Technology for up to eighteen
   months. After 18 months (or sooner) the data is stored in aggregate for
   up to three years.

   The security of your information is important to us. The Trade Desk has
   implemented security measures, including physical, electronic and
   administrative safeguards, to prevent the loss, misuse, and alteration
   of the information that our Technology collects, but we make no
   assurances about our ability to prevent such loss, misuse, to you or to
   any third party arising out of any such loss, misuse, or alteration.

Changes To Our Policy

   We may revise this policy at any time. Any changes and/or updates to
   the policy will be updated directly on this page. We encourage you to
   visit this page periodically to review our current privacy policy so
   that you will always know what information we gather and how we may use
   that information.

International Transfers, Safe Harbor and Privacy Shield

   The Trade Desk operates the Technology from servers located in the
   United States of America and the information it collects through
   Clients is processed in the United States of America. Laws governing
   the collection and use of data in the United States may not be
   equivalent to those in the country where you reside, but The Trade Desk
   will at all times protect your data in accordance with this Policy.

   To the extent they are applicable, The Trade Desk, Inc. complies with
   the principles of U.S./Swiss Safe Harbor Frameworks regarding Notice,
   Choice, Onward Transfer, Security, Data Integrity, Access and
   Enforcement with respect to the personal information it receives in the
   U.S. from Switzerland. To exercise their rights or file a complaint,
   residents of Switzerland may contact The Trade Desk, Inc. as described
   in the “Contact Us” section of this privacy policy, and our business
   customers can log into their accounts to directly access and correct
   certain information they have submitted. To learn more about the Safe
   Harbor Frameworks, please visit http://www.export.gov/safeharbor. You
   can search for and review our Safe Harbor certification at
   https://safeharbor.export.gov/list.aspx.

   If you have an unresolved privacy or data use concern that we have not
   addressed satisfactorily, please contact our U.S.-based third party
   dispute resolution provider (free of charge) at
   https://feedback-form.truste.com/watchdog/request.

   In connection with The Trade Desk, Inc.’s (“Company”) processing of
   personal data it receives from the EU (“EU Data”), Company adheres to
   the EU-U.S. Privacy Shield Framework Principles issued by the U.S.
   Department of Commerce (the “Principles”). For more information about
   the Principles, please visit the Department of Commerce’s Privacy
   Shield website, and for a list of participating companies, please visit
   the Department of Commerce's Privacy Shield List. Please be aware that
   in disclosure of information may be required in response to lawful
   requests by public authorities, for example to meet national security
   or law enforcement requirements.

   Please direct any inquiries or complaints regarding our compliance with
   the Principles to the point of contact listed in the “Contact Us”
   section below. If Company does not resolve your complaint, you may
   submit your complaint free of charge at
   https://feedback-form.truste.com/watchdog/request, Company’s designated
   Privacy Shield dispute resolution provider. Under certain conditions
   specified by the Principles, you may also be able to invoke binding
   arbitration to resolve your complaint, please click here for more
   information or to submit a compliant.Company is subject to the
   investigatory and enforcement powers of the FTC. If Company shares EU
   Data with a third-party service provider that processes the data solely
   on Company’s behalf, then Company will be liable for that third party’s
   processing of EU Data in violation of the Principles, unless Company
   can prove that it is not responsible for the event giving rise to the
   damage.

Contacting Us

   Should you have any questions in regards to this policy or The Trade
   Desk’s privacy practices, please contact our representatives at the
   following email and they will be more than happy to clarify and assist
   you in any way possible: [email protected], or by mail at:

   Privacy

   The Trade Desk, Inc.

   42 N. Chestnut Street

   Ventura, CA 93001

   PRIVACY PRACTICES FOR OUR WEBSITE

   Posted: September 30th, 2016, Effective Date: September 30th, 2016. For
   the prior versions of the privacy policy, please click here and here.

   This privacy policy describes how The Trade Desk collects and uses the
   personal informat ion you provide on our Web site, www.thetradedesk.com
   or otherwise to The Trade Desk through your contact with us, our
   employees and our contractors . It also describes the choices available
   to you regarding our use of your personally identifiable information
   (“PII”) and how you can access and update this information.

   If you have an unresolved privacy or data use concern that we have not
   addressed satisfactorily, please contact our U.S.-based third party
   dispute resolution provider (free of charge) at
   https://feedback-form.truste.com/watchdog/request.

   To the extent they are applicable, The Trade Desk, Inc. complies with
   the principles of the U.S./Swiss Safe Harbor Frameworks regarding
   Notice, Choice, Onward Transfer, Security, Data Integrity, Access and
   Enforcement with respect to the personal information it receives in the
   U.S. from Switzerland. To exercise their rights or file a complaint,
   residents of Switzerland may contact The Trade Desk, Inc. as described
   at the end of this privacy policy, and our business customers can log
   into their accounts to directly access and correct certain information
   they have submitted. In the event we are unable to resolve a
   disagreement with a covered European resident regarding the handling of
   his or her personal information under Safe Harbor, we agree to resolve
   the matter through the International Centre for Dispute Resolution /
   American Arbitration Association Safe Harbor Dispute Resolution Program
   (http://go.adr.org/safeharbor). To learn more about the Safe Harbor
   Frameworks, please visit http://www.export.gov/safeharbor. You can
   search for and review our Safe Harbor certification at
   https://safeharbor.export.gov/list.aspx.

   In connection with Company processing of personal data it receives from
   the EU (“EU Data”), Company adheres to the EU-U.S. Privacy Shield
   Framework Principles issued by the U.S. Department of Commerce (the
   “Principles”). For more information about the Principles, please visit
   the Department of Commerce’s Privacy Shield website, and for a list of
   participating companies, please visit the Department of Commerce's
   Privacy Shield List.Please be aware that in disclosure of information
   may be required in response to lawful requests by public authorities,
   for example to meet national security or law enforcement requirements.

   Please direct any inquiries or complaints regarding our compliance with
   the Principles to the point of contact listed in the “Contact Us”
   section below. If Company does not resolve your complaint, you may
   submit your complaint free of charge at
   https://feedback-form.truste.com/watchdog/request, Company’s designated
   Privacy Shield dispute resolution provider. Under certain conditions
   specified by the Principles, you may also be able to invoke binding
   arbitration to resolve your complaint, please click here for more
   information or to submit a compliant. Company is subject to the
   investigatory and enforcement powers of the FTC. If Company shares EU
   Data with a third-party service provider that processes the data solely
   on Company’s behalf, then Company will be liable for that third party’s
   processing of EU Data in violation of the Principles, unless Company
   can prove that it is not responsible for the event giving rise to the
   damage.

   Information We Collect On Our Website or from Other
   Contact

   We collect PII such as name, email address and phone number when you
   contact us with questions regarding our service or to request a
   demonstration of our product. You may also provide PII when you request
   a whitepaper, enter a contest or sweepstakes run by us, provide our
   employees with your business card, or provide information for billing
   and other business purposes.

   We and/or our selected third-party partners may also collect data about
   visitors’ activities on this Website and across the Internet over time
   for non-advertising purposes, including to conduct analytics, measure
   trends, and streamline website usability. Please see the section below
   on “Automatic Data Collection” for more information.

   How We Use Information We Collect On Our Website

   PII on this website is only collected on the Contact Us, Request a
   Demo, Get More Info, or Newsletter Signup sections. Information
   collected from whitepaper or contest submissions, or that you provide
   to an employee of TD, shall be used for the purposes disclosed at the
   time of collection, and may be used for marketing purposes relating to
   our products or services. Information collected for billing and related
   purposes shall be used for the purposes disclosed at the time of
   collection, as well as credit checks, invoicing, collection,
   troubleshooting, account maintenance, and other related business
   purposes.

Communications From The Site

   Newsletters

   If you wish to subscribe to our newsletter, we will use your email
   address to send the newsletter to you. If you no longer wish to receive
   these email communications you can follow the unsubscribe instructions
   contained in the emails you receive or by contacting us at
   [email protected]

   Service-related Announcements

   We will send you strictly service-related announcements on rare
   occasions when it is necessary to do so. For instance, if our service
   is temporarily suspended for maintenance, we might send you an email.

   Generally, you may not opt-out of these communications, which are not
   promotional in nature. If you do not wish to receive them, you have the
   option to deactivate your account.

Who We Share PII With

   We will share your personal information with third parties only in the
   ways that are described in this privacy statement.

   • We may provide your personal information to companies that provide
   services to help us with our business activities such as sending email
   communications on our behalf. These companies are authorized to use
   your personal information only as necessary to provide these services
   to us.

   • We may also disclose your personal information:

   o As required by law, such as to comply with a subpoena, or similar
   legal process,

   o When we believe in good faith that disclosure is necessary to protect
   our rights, protect your safety or the safety of others, investigate
   fraud, or respond to a government request,

   o If The Trade Desk is involved in a merger, acquisition, or sale of
   all or a portion of its assets, you will be notified via email and/or a
   prominent notice on our Web site of any change in ownership or uses of
   your personal information, as well as any choices you may have
   regarding your personal information, or

   o any other third party with your prior consent to do so.

Third Party Websites

   The Trade Desk Website may contain links to and advertisements for
   websites operated by third parties whose privacy practices may differ
   from ours. While we endeavor to associate only with reputable entities,
   The Trade Desk is not responsible for the privacy practices of these
   other websites. We encourage you to check the privacy policies of all
   websites that you visit.

Updating / Deleting your PII

   If you’d like us to update, correct, delete, or deactivate any PII that
   you have provided to us on this Website, please resubmit your contact
   information on the Contact Us page or send your request to us at
   [email protected] and we will process your request within 30 days of
   receiving it.

Data Retention

   We will retain your information for as long as your account is active
   or as needed to provide you services. We will retain and use your
   information as necessary to comply with our legal obligations, resolve
   disputes, and enforce our agreements.

Security

   The security of your personal information is important to us. The Trade
   Desk has implemented security measures to prevent the loss, misuse, and
   alteration of the information that our Technology collects, but we make
   no assurances about our ability to prevent such loss, misuse, to you or
   to any third party arising out of any such loss, misuse, or alteration.

Third Party Advertisers

   The Trade Desk follows the Digital Advertising Alliance Self-Regulatory
   Principles and the Network Advertising Initiative Code of Conduct. We
   may allow certain third parties to collect data about your web viewing
   behavior on The Trade Desk website and combine this data with
   information collected from other websites over time for purposes that
   include interest-based advertising. If you would like to learn more
   about this type of advertising, or would prefer to opt-out of
   interest-based advertising, U.S. residents may visit
   www.aboutads.info/choices or www.networkadverising.org/choices,
   European residents may visit www.youronlinechoices.com, and Canadian
   residents may visit http://youradchoices.ca/choices/. These websites
   allow you to opt-out of interest-based advertising by companies
   participating in these self-regulatory programs. To learn more about
   how to opt-out of interest-based advertising by The Trade Desk, please
   visit our Opt-Out Page.

Automatic Data Collection

   We and/or our selected third-party partners may also collect data about
   visitors’ activities on this Website and across the Internet over time
   for non-advertising purposes, including to conduct analytics, measure
   trends, and streamline website usability. The technologies used for
   this purpose may include log files, cookies, web beacons, and social
   media plug-ins as described below. One of the service providers we may
   use is Google Analytics. To learn more about how Google Analytics
   collects and processes data and the choices you may have to control
   these activities, you may visit
   http://www.google/com/intl/en/policies/privacy/partners/.

   Log Files

   As is true of most Web sites, we and our third party tracking-utility
   partner(s) may gather certain information automatically and store it in
   log files. This information includes internet protocol (IP) addresses,
   browser type, internet service provider (ISP), referring/exit pages,
   operating system, date/time stamp, and clickstream data.

   We use this information to analyze trends, to administer the site, to
   track users’ movements around the site and to gather demographic
   information about our user base as a whole.

   Cookies

   A cookie is a small text file that is stored on a user’s computer for
   record-keeping purposes. We use cookies on this site. We do link the
   information we store in cookies to any personally identifiable
   information you submit while on our site.

   You can remove persistent cookies by following directions provided in
   your Internet browser’s “help” file. If you reject cookies, you may
   still use our site, but your ability to use some areas of our site,
   such as contests or surveys, may be limited.

   The use of cookies by our partners and service providers is not covered
   by our privacy statement. We do not have access or control over these
   cookies.

   Clear Gifs

   Our third party partners or service providers may employ a software
   technology called clear gifs (a.k.a. Web Beacons/Web Bugs), that help
   us better manage content on our site by informing us what content is
   effective. Clear gifs are tiny graphics with a unique identifier,
   similar in function to cookies, and are used to track the online
   movements of Web users. In contrast to cookies, which are stored on a
   user’s computer hard drive, clear gifs are embedded invisibly on Web
   pages and are about the size of the period at the end of this sentence.
   We tie the information gathered by clear gifs to our customers’
   personally identifiable information.

   We use clear gifs in our HTML-based emails to let us know which emails
   have been opened by recipients. This allows us to gauge the
   effectiveness of certain communications and the effectiveness of our
   marketing campaigns.

   Social Media

   Our Web site includes Social Media Features, such as the Facebook Like
   button. These Features may collect your IP address, which page you are
   visiting on our site, and may set a cookie to enable the Feature to
   function properly. Social Media Features are either hosted by a third
   party or hosted directly on our Site. Your interactions with these
   Features are governed by the privacy policy of the company providing
   it. Please see above for more information on third-party advertising
   activities on our Site.

   California Do Not Track Disclosure

   Please note that The Trade Desk does not currently honor browsers’ DNT
   (do not track) settings.

Testimonials

   We post customer testimonials on our web site which may contain
   personally identifiable information. We obtain the customer’s consent
   via email prior to posting the testimonial to post their name along
   with their testimonial. If you want your testimonial removed please
   contact us at [email protected]

Changes To This Privacy Policy

   We may update this privacy policy to reflect changes to our information
   practices. We encourage you to periodically review this page for the
   latest information on our privacy practices.

Contact Us

   If you have any questions or suggestions regarding our privacy policy,
   please contact us at: 42 N. Chestnut Street, Ventura, CA 93001 or via
   email at [email protected]

   • FOLLOW ON TWITTER

   Top
     * About
     * Products
     * Insights
     * Careers
     * Trading Academy

   ©2019 The Trade Desk. All rights reserved. | Website Privacy Policy |
   Services Privacy Policy | Opt-Out
     * Facebook
     * Twitter
     * LinkedIn
     * Instagram
     * YouTube

   IAB Digital Advertising Alliance
   #alternate

   Skip to main content Menu
   The Trade Desk

     * About
          + Leadership
          + Partners
          + Press Releases
          + Industry Initiatives
          + Investor Relations
     * Products
          + Advertising Channels
          + Connected TV Advertising
          + Audio Advertising
          + Mobile Advertising
          + Native Advertising
          + Video Advertising
          + Planning & Buying Tools
          + Planner
          + Koa™ Artificial Intelligence
          + Data Management Platform
          + Cross-Device Targeting
          + Inventory & Marketplaces
          + Enterprise Solutions
          + Enterprise API™
     * Insights
          + All
          + Trends
          + Success Stories
          + Media Coverage
     * Careers
          + Jobs
     * Trading Academy

     * Contact Us
     * Log In

   ____________________ (BUTTON) Search
   English
     * 中文 (简体)

   ____________________ (BUTTON) Search

We’re transforming media for the benefit of humankind

   Learn More
   The Trade Desk: Media for Humankind

   Advertising — it’s what fuels the open internet and supports content
   creators, journalists, and the open exchange of information and ideas.
   We built our media-buying platform to power a more engaging and
   inspiring ecosystem for everyone.

   Our mission is to transform media for the benefit of humankind. How? By
   helping brands deliver a more insightful and relevant ad experience for
   consumers, and setting a new standard for global reach, accuracy, and
   transparency. Learn what makes us different.

Independence.

   We’re on the buy side. Which is everyone’s side. We never steer you
   toward our own media assets, because we don’t own any. It’s
   that simple.

Reach.

   One billion. That’s how many more people you can reach with The Trade
   Desk than with other major media-buying platforms.

Objectivity.

   We want you to spend your ad dollars where your data leads you. That
   allows for transparency in everything we do — from pricing and
   inventory to measurement and reporting.

Open.

   An open internet starts with an open platform. Which is why we built
   one. Our APIs are open too, so you get more value from your
   first-party data.

The whole of media should work for all of us, not just some of us.

   Learn More

Twitter

   Thank you @adweek for featuring our work and highlighting the purpose
   of our #mediaforhumankind campaign: https://t.co/SGsaL5tVaa
   September 24

   Clairvoyance allows Laura Taylor at @GoodwayGroup USA to understand how
   her team can use new technology to fit her… https://t.co/R2SJuk4dxH
   September 24

   Our brand campaign #MediaforHumankind is meant to describe the purpose
   of The Trade Desk. Our CMO @SusanVobejda sha… https://t.co/4AzqlioQ0V
   September 24

   RT @AdNews: Adtech The Trade Desk has released a new campaign, Media
   for Humankind, which aims to create a fairer and more transparent digi…
   September 24

Recent News

   August 22, 2019

Atom Tickets and The Trade Desk Partner to Provide Movie Marketers with
Ticket Sales Insights

   August 20, 2019

The Trade Desk Appoints Calvin Chan as General Manager, China

   August 13, 2019

PubMatic Reveals Significant Improvement Across Match Rates and Efficiency
from Adoption of The Trade Desk’s Unified ID Solution

   Top

     * About
     * Products
     * Insights
     * Careers
     * Trading Academy

   ©2019 The Trade Desk. All rights reserved. | Website Privacy Policy |
   Services Privacy Policy | Opt-Out
     * Facebook
     * Twitter
     * LinkedIn
     * Instagram
     * YouTube

   IAB Digital Advertising Alliance
   Skip to main content Menu
   The Trade Desk
     * About
          + Leadership
          + Partners
          + Press Releases
          + Industry Initiatives
          + Investor Relations
     * Products
          + Advertising Channels
          + Connected TV Advertising
          + Audio Advertising
          + Mobile Advertising
          + Native Advertising
          + Video Advertising
          + Planning & Buying Tools
          + Planner
          + Koa™ Artificial Intelligence
          + Data Management Platform
          + Cross-Device Targeting
          + Inventory & Marketplaces
          + Enterprise Solutions
          + Enterprise API™
     * Insights
          + All
          + Trends
          + Success Stories
          + Media Coverage
     * Careers
          + Jobs
     * Trading Academy

     * Contact Us
     * Log In

   ____________________ (BUTTON) Search
   English
     * 中文 (简体)

   ____________________ (BUTTON) Search

Privacy and The Trade Desk Platform

   Adbrain is now a part of the Trade Desk Platform.
   This page is about privacy for our Trade Desk Platform and the data it
   uses for delivering advertising. If you are interested in our corporate
   and website privacy policy, click here.

   Last updated: 29 August 2019

   Overview

   At A Glance

   Full Privacy Policy

   The Platform

   The data the Platform collects and processes

   How the Platform collects data

   Cookies

   The purposes for which the Platform processes data

   More about Personalisation

   European Union controller/processor designation and legal bases

   Sharing and Transfer

   The EU-U.S. and Swiss-U.S. Privacy Shield Frameworks

   Security and data retention

   Your choices – control over data

   Your Data Rights

   Changes to our policies

   Contact Us

Overview

   The Trade Desk offers what is known in the industry as a Demand Side
   Platform (DSP). In simple terms this means we provide technology that
   helps advertisers and their advertising agencies manage digital
   advertising campaigns across many channels, such as websites, apps,
   audio, smart tvs, and other video. The ads our clients buy help pay for
   the content you enjoy.

   We, and our clients, collect and use data both to help ensure that the
   ads you see are relevant and to measure and report on their
   effectiveness.

   Our AdBrain product, which is part of our Platform, uses data to
   produce a mapping of devices that might be related to each other,
   meaning that they might be used by the same person or by people in the
   same household. This helps advertisers better target and measure their
   campaigns, as well as to try to limit the number of times the same
   person or household sees an ad.

   Data that is in our Platform is pseudonymous, which means that it does
   not directly identify people. So, our Platform doesn’t have names,
   email addresses, phone numbers, or the like, and we prohibit clients
   and partners from putting that kind of data into our Platform. Our
   clients and partners may, outside of our Platform, have access to other
   information about you, including information that directly identifies
   you. Such information is governed by the clients’ own legal
   requirements, privacy policies, contracts, or other terms that they
   have in place.

   By the term “Platform”, we mean The Trade Desk’s own advertising
   technology platform and systems. Our references to our Platform do not
   include the technology or systems of clients or partners that use, or
   integrate with us. They are bound by our policies when they use our
   Platform.

   The Trade Desk is a member of the Network Advertising Initiative(NAI)
   (http://www.networkadvertising.org) and adheres to the NAI’s 2018 Code
   of Conduct. The Trade Desk also follows the industry self-regulatory
   guidelines of the Digital Advertising Alliance (http://aboutads.info),
   the Digital Advertising Alliance of Canada (https://youradchoices.ca),
   and the European Digital Advertising Alliance (
   http://youronlinechoices.com).

   The Trade Desk also implements and adheres to the policies of the IAB
   EU Transparency & Consent Framework as part of our compliance with EU
   data protection law. See http://advertisingconsent.eu for more
   information.

   If you want to go directly to our Opt Out, please
   visit http://www.adsrvr.org.

At A Glance

   Read the table for a quick overview. See below the table for detailed
   information.

   Who we are:

   Email: privacy ((at)) thetradedesk ((dot)) com

   Global HQ:
   The Trade Desk, Inc.
   42 N. Chestnut St
   Ventura, CA 93001
   USA

   EEA and Switzerland:
   The UK Trade Desk Ltd.
   10th Floor, 1 Bartholomew Close
   London EC1A 7BL
   United Kingdom

   What we do:

   Advertising technology platform for managing digital advertising
   campaigns.

   The data our Platform collects and processes:

   Pseudonymous data such as:
     * unique cookie and device identifiers
     * mobile device advertising identifiers
     * IP addresses
     * web browsing history from advertising impressions we see
     * interest information inferred by us from web browsing history
     * interest information stored and/or used on the Platform by clients
       and partners
     * location information
     * browser and device type, version and settings

   How the Platform collects data:

   Some of the ways the Platform collects data include:
     * from partners sending us requests for ads on websites, mobile
       applications, smart televisions, video devices, and other media
     * using cookies and pixels
     * from clients and partners uploading data to our platform
     * from clients and partners using our technology to collect data

   The purposes for which the Platform processes data:

   The Platform processes data both on our behalf and on behalf of clients
   and partners for advertising purposes such as:
     * personalizing ads
     * delivering ads
     * limiting the number of times you see an ad
     * measuring effectiveness of ads
     * reporting on ad campaigns
     * maintaining ad transaction records
     * attributing purchases or other actions to ads
     * associating devices that might be related to each other
     * preventing malicious or invalid activity

   Sharing and transfer:

   We share data with other parties such as:
     * clients and partners to help improve the effectiveness of their,
       and their clients’ advertising
     * if we think it is required by law

   In addition, a lot of the data collected on the Platform belongs to our
   clients and partners. They, of course, are able to remove such data
   from the Platform.

   We may transfer data from the country of origin to the US or other
   countries. We do so under a valid legal framework, such as Privacy
   Shield.

   We may also disclose personal information in response to lawful
   requests from public authorities, including to meet security or law
   enforcement requirements.

   Security and Data Retention:

   We maintain generally accepted security methods to protect data on the
   Platform.

   We retain pseudonymous data up to 18 months before we aggregate it.

   Your rights and choices:

   You have rights and choices with respect to the personal data on the
   Platform.

Full Privacy Policy

   Below, we explain in detail the type of data we collect, how we collect
   it, how we use it, and how we disclose it, as well as the choices
   available to you. Please keep in mind that the digital advertising
   industry is extremely complex, so we can’t present every technical
   detail. If, after reading this policy, you still have questions, please
   feel free to contact us at privacy ((at) thetradedesk ((dot)) com.

The Platform

   The Platform allows advertisers and advertising agencies to manage
   digital advertising campaigns. It is a Demand Side Platform because we
   represent the demand side of the digital advertising marketplace, in
   which advertisers and agencies with ads to display are the “demand” and
   publishers with space for such ads on web pages, apps, smart TVs and
   other properties are the “supply”.

   Digital advertising uses data to make ads more effective and to measure
   their effectiveness. Without data our advertiser clients wouldn’t know,
   for example, if 100 different users each saw an ad, or if one user saw
   the same ad 100 times. This data is crucial to online and mobile
   content. Without data like this, advertisers would pay publishers much
   less, forcing publishers to either show more ads or make users pay for
   their content.

   Advertisers and their agencies collect and use data on the Platform in
   different ways. They may bring their own data to the Platform. They
   collect data using the Platform. And they can remove their data from
   the Platform. We contractually prohibit them from having data that
   directly identifies individuals, such as names, email addresses, phone
   numbers, and the like on the Platform. Instead, data on the Platform is
   what we call pseudonymous, as described further below.

The data the Platform collects and processes

   The Platform collects and processes pseudonymous – i.e. not directly
   identifying – data about users, devices, and ads and where they’re
   shown. This includes:
     * unique cookie identifiers
     * mobile device advertising identifiers
     * IP addresses
     * interest information stored and/or used on the platform by clients
       and partners
     * interest information we create
     * other information about browsers and devices, such as type, version
       and settings
     * location information based on IP address or latitude/longitude
       coordinates, if provided to us
     * information about ads that are shown, such as which ads are shown
       to a device or user, where (which web page or app) they are shown,
       and at what time

How the Platform collects data

   The Platform receives data in several ways, including the following:
     * Bid requests, which are sets of information that describe an ad
       space that is available to be filled. We get these requests from
       the “supply” side of the advertising ecosystem, meaning websites,
       apps, smart televisions, and others, as well as their agents. The
       requests contain information about the ad space, the device, and
       sometimes the user, including location information. They also
       usually have an ID that enables us to match the request with
       information we may already have.
     * Purveyors of connected TV devices and apps can send us
       information about the video content viewed on the device or app.
     * Pixels and cookies, which allow us to recognize web browsers across
       sites and over time, and therefore to record information about them
       over time.
     * Mobile device IDs, which are provided by the device operating
       systems, like Apple’s iOS and Google’s Android, for purposes of
       allowing mobile apps and their advertising partners to recognize a
       device over time. We use these IDs the same way we use cookies, but
       for mobile apps instead of browsers.
     * Mobile SDKs are bits of code that some of our partners enable to be
       placed in mobile apps. This enables our partners to send us data
       about the mobile app and device in association with the mobile
       device ID.

Cookies

   The Platform uses cookies for the advertising related purposes
   described in this policy.

   Our cookie domain is adsrvr.org. Cookies help us by enabling us to
   distinguish between, recognize, and store data about unique web
   browsers and devices, and to store data on our servers for the
   advertising purposes described here. We also use non-unique cookies to
   store cookie-based opt-out choices, when users opt out.

   In order to be able to transmit requests for ads, and other data about
   users or devices, between sellers and buyers, and to help show you ads
   that match your likely interests, we engage in cookie syncing, meaning
   that we match our cookie IDs to clients’ and partners’ cookie IDs.

The purposes for which the Platform processes data

   The Platform processes data both on our own behalf and on behalf of
   clients and partners for purposes related to the targeting, delivering,
   and measuring of and reporting on advertising.
     * Personalizing ads makes sure they are relevant and effective.
     * Delivering ads includes, for example, making sure the ad gets
       shown, keeping track of how many times it’s shown, as well as where
       and when.
     * Measurement and analytics includes tracking how well ads perform,
       such as whether users clicked or went to a client’s store after
       their ad campaign was shown.
     * Reporting on ad campaigns includes compilations of measurement,
       attribution, and other data to report on the performance and
       success of campaigns, as well as transaction reporting and
       verification.
     * Clicks and conversions measure actions taken by a user with respect
       to a particular ad, i.e., a click on an ad, or a download of an
       app.
     * Attribution means matching particular ad views to
       subsequent actions taken by a user. For example, a car advertiser
       might be able to see that someone who saw an ad for a car four
       times, purchased that car. This would be done by stitching together
       data collected from our Platform with the advertiser’s own data and
       data from other companies. When this is done, we don’t get any data
       that allows us to directly identify the purchaser of the car.
     * Cross device graphing uses algorithms to associate devices that
       might be related to each other, such as devices used by the same
       person or in the same household.
     * Malicious or invalid activity can be a problem for companies and
       users. For example, we process information in an attempt to
       identify and prevent purveyors of malware or bots that try to take
       advertising dollars for ads that aren’t shown to real users or that
       try to harm users’ devices.

More about Personalisation

   Sometimes, as part of our Platform, we create and use user profiles
   associated with unique IDs. This means that we look at the information
   associated with the IDs, and with the requests for ads, such as the
   content in which the ad is shown, the time, the geographic location,
   and the type of device. Sometimes we also use information about whether
   or how users responded to ads to find other users who would respond to
   ads. We apply various computational methods on this information to find
   groupings of IDs that may have certain interests or characteristics,
   such as “clothing,” “sports,” “travel,” “male,” “25-54,” and so on. Our
   Platform also enables data suppliers to bring data to the Platform that
   our clients can use on the Platform to improve their ad campaigns.

   Clients can bring their own data to the Platform for their own
   personalisation. Their sources and methods for acquiring this data
   vary, and are subject to our clients’ own policies and legal
   obligations, but we do contractually prohibit certain types of data
   from being introduced onto the Platform, such as directly identifying
   data or sensitive data.

   As required under the NAI Code, The Trade Desk discloses standard
   interest segments that are based on health related information or
   interests that it makes available in the Platform where permitted by
   law and self-regulatory rules.

   Data that is considered sensitive or in special categories according to
   local rules, including data about children, is subject to
   restrictions on the Platform. Our contracts prohibit clients and
   partners from using data on the Platform that is from or about users
   that they know are children or that is considered sensitive or
   special. And we do not knowingly use such data on the Platform.

European Union controller/processor designation and legal bases

   If you are based in the European Economic Area (EEA) or Switzerland,
   The UK Trade Desk Ltd. is responsible for processing your personal
   information. Under the definitions of “Controller” and “Processor” in
   EU law, this processing is in some cases as a Controller of data and in
   some cases as a Processor. Trade Desk are a Controller, for example,
   over personalised user interest segments that we create for our
   Platform, when we have appropriate permissions.

   When we collect data for personalisation from requests for ads that we
   receive as described above, under EU law, we will use consent as our
   legal basis for doing so.

   We process data for other purposes when we have a legitimate interest
   in doing so and that interest is not outweighed by the rights or
   freedoms of individual data subjects.

Sharing and Transfer

   We share data with other parties in some circumstances
     * Some of the data processed on the Platform belongs to our clients.
       When this is the case, our clients can take this data, such as
       records of advertising impressions, off of the Platform.
     * We share pseudonymous IDs that we think might be related to other
       pseudonymous IDs with clients and partners that use our AdBrain
       product.
     * Some of our clients and partners receive ad request data through
       the Platform for advertising purposes.
     * We may share data in order to investigate or prevent reasonably
       suspected malicious activity, fake traffic, or other activity that
       may be harmful to us or our clients.
     * We may use service providers that store or process data on our
       behalf.
     * We may transfer data to a successor entity in connection with a
       corporate merger, consolidation, sale of assets, bankruptcy, or
       other corporate change.
     * We may share aggregated data that does not include individual-level
       records with any party or publicly.
     * We may disclose personal data in response to lawful requests by
       public authorities, including to meet national security or law
       enforcement requirements.

   We transfer personal data to countries other than the country in which
   it was collected. We do so under a valid legal framework, such as a
   Privacy Shield. If we receive data under the Privacy Shield and
   transfer it on to a third party acting as an agent on our behalf, we
   will remain liable under the Privacy Shield Principles for that third
   party’s processing of the data.

The EU-U.S. and Swiss-U.S. Privacy Shield Frameworks

   We transfer data from the EU or Switzerland to the US under our Privacy
   Shield certification. If there is any conflict between the terms in
   this Policy and the Privacy Shield Principles, the Privacy Shield
   Principles shall govern.

   Under the Privacy Shield, we commit to resolve complaints about our
   collection or use of your personal data, and are subject to enforcement
   by the US Federal Trade Commission. EU and Swiss individuals with
   inquiries or complaints regarding our Privacy Shield policy should
   first contact us at privacy ((at)) thetradedesk ((dot)) com or at the
   address listed in the “Contact” section of this Policy. If you have
   unresolved privacy or data use concerns that we have not addressed
   satisfactorily, please contact our U.S. based third-party dispute
   resolution provider (free of charge) at
   https://feedback-form.truste.com/watchdog/request.

   Under certain conditions specified by the Privacy Shield Principles,
   you may also be able to invoke binding arbitration to resolve your
   complaint. Please click here for more information or to submit a
   complaint.

   You may have certain legal rights with respect to data transferred
   under the Privacy Shield Framework. See YOUR DATA RIGHTS below.

Security and data retention

   We retain the pseudonymous data collected on our Platform for up to 18
   months. After 18 months (often sooner) the data is aggregated and
   stored for up to 3 additional years. This retention policy does not
   apply to client or partner data.

   We have implemented security measures, including physical, electronic
   and administrative safeguards, to prevent the unauthorized access to,
   loss, misuse, or alteration of the information that our Platform
   collects. We believe these measures are appropriate given the nature of
   the data and our systems, but we make no assurances in this policy
   about our ability to prevent any such event or the possible harm to you
   or any third party that could arise from it.

Your choices – control over data

   Industry opt-out pages. The online advertising industry provides
   websites from which you may opt out of interest-based advertising from
   the Trade Desk and other companies that participate in industry
   self-regulatory programs. The US-based opt out pages
   are www.aboutads.info/choices and www.networkadvertising.org/choices.
   The European based page is www.youronlinechoices.com. In Canada, use
   youradchoices.ca/choices.

    For mobile apps. You can opt out of the Trade Desk using information
   about your usage of mobile apps that are targeted to your interests by
   using your device settings, for most devices. We are not able to
   directly access the Mobile App Opt Out on devices that offer it. To
   learn how to use the mobile app opt out, consult your device
   instructions. To find information on Opting out on Mobile Devices
   please visit  http://www.networkadvertising.org/mobile-choice</a>

    The Trade Desk’s Data Control Page. You are able to opt out of having
   new data associated with your device and to request that we
   disassociate from your device data we already have. You can directly
   access The Trade Desk’s opt out, which will cease data collection and
   disassociate data from your device, by visiting  http://www.adsrvr.org.

Your Data Rights

   Individuals in the EEA and Switzerland may have certain legal rights
   with respect to data the Trade Desk collects and processes in
   association with your device. These rights include the right of access,
   deletion and correction of personal data. These rights may be limited,
   for example if fulfilling your request would reveal personal data about
   another person, where they would infringe the rights of a third party
   (including our rights) or if you ask us to delete information which we
   are required by law to keep or have compelling legitimate interests in
   keeping. Relevant exemptions are included in both the GDPR and local
   implementing legislation. We will inform you of relevant exemptions we
   rely upon when responding to any request you make.

   To make a request to exercise any of these rights in respect of data
   for which the Trade Desk is Data Controller, please email dsr ((at))
   thetradedesk ((dot)) com.

Changes to our policies

   We may revise this policy at any time. However, if we make material
   changes, we will not apply them retroactively.

Contact Us

   You may contact us regarding privacy.

   Email: privacy ((at)) thetradedesk ((dot)) com

   Global Data Protection Officer (DPO)
   The Trade Desk, Global Privacy Office
   2 Park Avenue, 5th Floor
   New York, NY 10016
   Email: dpo ((at)) thetradedesk ((dot)) com

   If you have a concern regarding our privacy practices, please contact
   us via the contacts above. If after reasonable efforts you believe your
   concern has not been satisfactorily addressed by us:
     * In the US, our privacy practices are regulated by the Federal Trade
       Commission.
     * In the EU or Switzerland, for concerns that pertain to the transfer
       of data from the EU or Switzerland under the EU-US or Swiss-US
       Privacy Shield Frameworks, please contact our U.S. based
       third-party dispute resolution provider (free of charge) at
       https://feedback-form.truste.com/watchdog/request.
     * Otherwise, in the EU, we recommend you contact the Information
       Commissioner’s Office (ICO) of the United Kingdom.

   Top
     * About
     * Products
     * Insights
     * Careers
     * Trading Academy

   ©2019 The Trade Desk. All rights reserved. | Website Privacy Policy |
   Services Privacy Policy | Opt-Out
     * Facebook
     * Twitter
     * LinkedIn
     * Instagram
     * YouTube

   IAB Digital Advertising Alliance
   Skip to main content Menu
   The Trade Desk
     * About
          + Leadership
          + Partners
          + Press Releases
          + Industry Initiatives
          + Investor Relations
     * Products
          + Advertising Channels
          + Connected TV Advertising
          + Audio Advertising
          + Mobile Advertising
          + Native Advertising
          + Video Advertising
          + Planning & Buying Tools
          + Planner
          + Koa™ Artificial Intelligence
          + Data Management Platform
          + Cross-Device Targeting
          + Inventory & Marketplaces
          + Enterprise Solutions
          + Enterprise API™
     * Insights
          + All
          + Trends
          + Success Stories
          + Media Coverage
     * Careers
          + Jobs
     * Trading Academy

     * Contact Us
     * Log In

   ____________________ (BUTTON) Search
   English
     * 中文 (简体)

   ____________________ (BUTTON) Search

Privacy Policy

   TRUSTe

   The Trade Desk is committed to protecting consumer privacy and
   respecting your right to choice as it relates to advertising and the
   data used to help serve ads relevant to those consumers. The Trade Desk
   is a technology company that helps advertisers connect with consumers
   who are interested in, or could benefit from, the advertisers’
   products. Protecting consumer privacy is a top priority to The Trade
   Desk. See below for our complete Privacy Policy. You can go directly to
   the section of the Privacy Policy that you want to read:

   · The Trade Desk Services Privacy Practices

   · Privacy Practices for Our Website

   Consumer Opt-Out Choices

   The Trade Desk Services: If you would prefer not to have The Trade Desk
   serve you relevant ads, you may go to our opt-out page to learn more:
   Opt Out of Relevant Advertising. If you opt out through this page, you
   may continue to see ads from The Trade Desk, but these ads will not be
   targeted based on your online activity history. For more information on
   The Trade Desk services and our practices, please see below.

   Third Parties on The Trade Desk Website: We may allow certain third
   parties to collect data about your web viewing behavior on The Trade
   Desk website and combine this data with information collected from
   other websites over time for purposes that include interest-based
   advertising. If you would like to learn more about this type of
   advertising, or would prefer to opt-out of interest-based advertising,
   U.S. residents may visit www.aboutads.info/choices or
   www.networkadverising.org/choices, European residents may visit
   www.youronlinechoices.com, and Canadian residents may visit
   http://youradchoices.ca/choices/. For more information on The Trade
   Desk website practices, please see below.

   Commitment to Industry Self-Regulation: The Trade Desk follows the
   Digital Advertising Alliance (“DAA”) Self-Regulatory Principles and
   adheres to the Network Advertising Initiative (“NAI”) Code of Conduct
   as a member of NAI. Click here if you would like further information
   regarding the DAA principles and here if you would like information
   about the NAI Code of Conduct. Consistent with these principles, the
   health/fitness related segments available in The Trade Desk for
   behavioral advertising can be viewed here.

   The Trade Desk also adheres to the European Interactive Digital
   Advertising Alliance’s (“EDAA”) principles. You can learn more and opt
   out of behavioral advertising here.

   Further, The Trade Desk follows the Canadian Self-Regulatory Principles
   for Online Behavioural Advertising’s (“DAAC”) principles. You can learn
   more and opt out of behavioral advertising here. Please contact
   [email protected] for any questions about The Trade Desk privacy,
   security, and data practices. Please see below for our complete Privacy
   Policy.

   The Trade Desk Services Privacy Practices

   Posted: September 30th, 2016, Effective Date: September 30th, 2016.

   For the prior versions of the privacy policy, please click here and
   here.

Contents

   BACKGROUND REGARDING OUR TECHNOLOGY AND SERVICES

   PRIVACY PRACTICES FOR OUR TECHNOLOGY

   How We Use Information Our Technology Collects

   Cookies, Web Beacons and Mobile SDKs

   Information Sharing

   Interest-Based Advertising and Opting Out

   Opting Out on iOS Devices Such as iPhones, iPads or iPods

   Opting Out on Android Devices

   Data Storage and Security

   Changes To Our Policy

   International Transfers and Safe Harbor

   Contacting Us

   PRIVACY PRACTICES FOR OUR WEBSITE

   Information We Collect On Our Website

   Communications From The Site

   Who We Share PII With

   Third Party Websites

   Updating / Deleting your PII

   Data Retention

   Security

   Automatic Data Collection

   Testimonials

   Changes To This Privacy Policy

   Contact Us

   BACKGROUND REGARDING OUR TECHNOLOGY AND SERVICES.

   The Trade Desk, Inc. (“we”, “us”, or “our”) provides an online
   advertising and technology platform and we are headquartered in the
   United States. We provide this privacy policy to inform you about how
   we collect and use data on our corporate website, which is located at
   www.thetradedesk.com (the “Website”), and how our technology platform
   and related technology, such as pixels` (“Technology”) processes
   information on behalf of online advertisers, website owners, data
   providers and other businesses that use our services (those online
   advertisers and their agencies who use our technology are defined as
   our “Clients”). If you have any questions about this privacy policy,
   please feel free to contact us at [email protected]. The Trade Desk
   runs a buying platform for media and data. The Trade Desk Technology
   allows our Clients to buy ad space on websites, in apps, and on other
   digital platforms, and allows for the use of proprietary and third
   party data in the purchase of that ad space. When ad space is bought or
   sold digitally (usually to an advertiser or ad agency by a publisher or
   other content provider) the Technology, fulfills the transaction by
   delivering the ad to internet and mobile users who visit that site, use
   that application, or watch certain videos (for example). Generally, an
   Internet user’s computer, browser or device comes into contact with The
   Trade Desk when a user views an ad delivered or serviced by or with our
   Technology. Serving users relevant advertising is sometimes referred to
   as interest based advertising or online behavioral advertising (“OBA”).

   PRIVACY PRACTICES FOR OUR TECHNOLOGY

   Information Our Technology Collects. We believe that consumers prefer
   more (rather than less) relevant ads, tailored to their interests. To
   do this, we collect a variety of data from Clients, from data
   suppliers, and across platforms, to help optimize ads and increase the
   likelihood that a particular unique, but pseudonymous, user will be
   interested in (rather than potentially annoyed by) an ad shown. For
   more information on the technology used to collect the below
   information, please refer to the below section titled “Cookies, Web
   Beacons and Mobile SDKs.”

   • Our Technology collects information generally known as non-personally
   identifiable information (“Non-PII”) that may include, but is not
   limited to, your IP host address, the date and time of the ad request,
   specific location information of your device (which may be derived
   from, for example, your device’s GPS, Bluetooth, or WiFi signals),
   pages viewed, browser type, the referring URL, Internet Service
   Provider, and your computer’s operating system, as well as how you
   interact with a web page or ad. We may also collect Non-PII such as
   age, gender, income, education, interests, and usage activity from
   Clients or other third parties. We also may collect analogous Non-PII
   from mobile platforms, which may include information about your
   interactions with those applications (including your IP address and
   time-stamp information), and information about your mobile device
   (including device type, handset name, operating system information,
   mobile identifiers such as Apple IDFA and Android Advertising ID,
   app-specific identifiers, and a list of the applications your device
   interacts with).

   • Sometimes, we obtain the above information from other ad platforms,
   application platforms or providers, customers or websites and services
   (including our Clients). We may work with Clients or other third
   parties to synchronize or “sync” unique, pseudonymous identifiers to
   match our Clients’ Non-PII data or identifiers to our own, in order to
   enhance data points about a particular unique browser or device, and
   thus enable or send ads that are more relevant, match consumers to
   their likely product interests, or better synchronize, cap, or
   otherwise optimize advertising.

How We Use Information Our Technology Collects

   The Trade Desk uses Non-PII to target and serve or to help our Clients
   to target and serve relevant advertising to consumers and to perform
   attribution analysis or other analytics regarding advertising
   audiences, as well as to compile, match and link audiences on behalf of
   Clients. For instance, we may, or help our Clients to, use this Non-PII
   to:

   • Determine what ad to show a consumer, and customize ads to particular
   types of audiences;

   • Customize ads to the type of web page users are viewing;

   • Limit the number of times a consumer sees an ad or a type of ad;

   • Perform analysis of how effective the ads are;

   • Help advertisers learn more about their own consumers;

   • Troubleshooting; and

   • Fraud detection

   Sometimes we may use or make available to Clients products or services
   from third parties that utilize their data and the Non-PII we collect
   or receive (such as IP Address) to recognize users or try to resolve a
   commonality of users (or households) across platforms or across
   devices, such as smartphones, computers, tablets or related browsers or
   to connect app usage to browser usage on the same device. For instance,
   we might infer that a common IP address seen across different devices
   represents a common user (or a related or similar user), and use that
   inference in tailoring ads. Occasionally, we receive data sets (which
   may constitute hashed or obfuscated personally identifiable information
   (“PII”)), in order to promote, test or validate the accuracy of such
   inferences.

   We do not knowingly collect or obtain from third parties, any personal
   data, including any “sensitive personal data,” for OBA purposes, as
   defined under Directive 95/46/EC, and we contractually prohibit third
   parties from putting this data in our platform.

   In adherence to EDAA requirements, we do not create segments for OBA
   purposes that are specifically designed to target children (age 12 and
   under). While this does not mean that ad delivery will not occur, it
   means that we will not specifically target ads to children ages 12 and
   under.

Cookies, Web Beacons and Mobile SDKs

   In order to help make the online advertisements more relevant to users,
   our Technology uses the standard “cookies” feature of major browser
   applications that allows us to store a small piece of data on users’
   computers about users’ visits to certain websites. We also use cookies
   to understand users’ browsing and buying activities so that we can
   measure the success of online advertising campaigns we run.

   Cookies are small text files that web servers typically send to users’
   computer when they visit a website. Cookies are stored as text files on
   users’ hard drive, and can be accessed by web servers when the user
   visits a website or views an advertisement. Cookies are used by
   companies to collect and send information about a user’s website visits
   – for example, number of visits, average time spent, pages viewed,
   navigation history through the website, and other statistics. This
   information helps companies improve a user’s online experience in many
   ways: for example, by allowing companies to monitor website
   performance, making the website easier to use, measuring the
   effectiveness of their promotional placements, and tailoring their
   website (including the ads and offers they receive) to better match a
   user’s interests and preferences. Users who prefer not to accept
   cookies can set their Internet browser to block cookies.

   The Trade Desk cookie is set to expire after one year; our opt-out
   cookie lasts longer. Our cookie expiration may reset upon further
   interaction between ourselves (or as applicable a Client) and a browser
   or device.

   The Trade Desk also uses web beacons (also known as 1×1 gifs), along
   with cookies, to determine if a user has visited a particular website.
   These beacons aid in providing more relevant advertising to the user,
   as well measuring the success of an advertising campaign, but provide
   no personally identifiable information.

   HTML5 and Locally Stored Objects. Similar to cookies are pieces of code
   known as “locally stored objects,” which we may also use for storing
   Non-PII. Locally stored objects, such as HTML5 Web Storage, are used
   for similar purposes as cookies but typically contain a greater amount
   and different types of data than browser cookies. Most current versions
   of common web browsers clear this locally stored data when you delete
   or clear your cookie cache. To confirm whether this is the case for the
   browser you are using, or to learn more about how to precisely control
   this data storage, please consult the Help function of your browser.

   Mobile Device Identifiers and SDKs. We may sometimes work with Clients
   that use mobile SDKs to collect information. A mobile SDK is the mobile
   app version of a pixel tag or beacon (see those descriptions, above).
   The SDK is a bit of computer code that app developers can include in
   their apps to enable ads to be shown, data to be collected, and related
   services to be implemented. We may use this technology, or work with
   others who use this technology, to deliver certain advertising through
   mobile applications and browsers based on information associated with
   mobile devices. If you’d like to opt-out from having ads tailored to
   you in this way on your mobile device, please follow the instructions
   in the “Choices” section below.

Information Sharing

   The Trade Desk may share the Non-PII that we collect and receive in
   various ways.

   • Primarily, we work with Clients and other third parties to help
   optimize ads and make them more likely to be relevant to consumers, by
   comparing, syncing and sharing the Non-PII described above. For
   instance, we may share to other ad platforms, customers or websites and
   services (including our Clients) Non-PII we have collected (generally,
   unique, pseudonymous identifiers representing consumers’ browsers), in
   order for these third parties to match their unique identifiers to our
   own, so that we can “sync” identifiers in order to help them show more
   relevant ads, match consumers to their likely interests, or better
   synchronize, cap, or otherwise optimize advertising.

   • Further, the Non-PII we collect and receive may be processed on our
   behalf by third-party service providers that assist us in running our
   business, including providers of data storage and processing
   facilities.

   • We may disclose your information to third parties when we reasonably
   believe we are obligated to do so by law, and in order to investigate,
   prevent, or take action regarding suspected or actual activities that
   may harm any person, our company, the Technology, or otherwise violate
   any law.

   • Also, in the event The Trade Desk is merged into another company, or
   another company acquires all or substantially all of The Trade Desk’s
   assets, including, without limitation, in the event of bankruptcy, all
   data compiled or owned by The Trade Desk may be among the items
   transferred in that transaction.

   • We may share non-personal information with Clients, both in an
   aggregated and non-aggregated form, in connection with reporting and
   accounting needs as well as with other unaffiliated third parties for
   various purposes such as statistical or educational analysis (such as
   the creation of predictive models).

   • Finally, disclosure of information may be required in response to
   lawful requests by public authorities, for example to meet national
   security or law enforcement requirements.

Interest-Based Advertising and Opting Out

   The Trade Desk uses cookies, Web beacons, pixels and other technologies
   to collect web viewing data across non-affiliated sites over time. In
   addition, The Trade Desk collects app usage data across non-affiliated
   apps over time. We may also collect such Web viewing and app usage data
   from other ad platforms, application platforms or providers, customers
   or websites and services (including our Clients) and we may combine
   this information with any information that we have collected about you.
   We use this data to infer your interests and to provide more relevant
   advertising to you. This is known as Interest-Based Advertising
   (“IBA”).

   We may also facilitate our Clients’ efforts to place a cookie or other
   tracking technology on a website with which our Client has a
   relationship, and we may allow our Clients to collect information about
   your web viewing behavior on our website. This information may be
   combined with other data collected from other websites over time for
   IBA purposes.

   The Trade Desk follows the Digital Advertising Alliance (“DAA”)
   Self-Regulatory Principles and the Network Advertising Initiative
   (“NAI”) Code of Conduct.

   Opting Out for Web-based IBA: If you’d like to opt-out from having The
   Trade Desk use your Web viewing data and other Non-PII for web-based
   IBA purposes, please click here for more information on IBA and the
   choices that The Trade Desk offers with respect to IBA. The DAA and NAI
   also provide websites where you can learn more about IBA and opt out of
   receiving targeted ads from our advertising partners who participate in
   the DAA or NAI programs. You can access these websites at
   www.aboutads.info/choices and at www.networkadvertising.org/choices.
   Residents of the EEA and Switzerland may visit
   www.youronlinechoices.com.If you are located in Canada, you can access
   this information at http://youradchoices.ca/choices/.

   Opting Out for App-based IBA: If you are using a mobile device, you may
   be able to opt out of receiving IBA by The Trade Desk based on app
   usage data, through your device settings as described below. We provide
   the following descriptions solely for informational purposes. For
   additional information and up to date methods of opting out, you should
   consult your device settings, and instructions provided by device
   manufacturers. Additional information can be found at
   https://www.networkadvertising.org/understanding-online-advertising/wha
   t-are-my-options.

Opting Out on iOS Devices Such as iPhones, iPads or iPods

   If you have an Apple device, you can opt out of our IBA services by
   updating to iOS 6.0 or higher, and setting Limit Ad Tracking to ‘ON’.
   You can do this by clicking on Settings -> General -> About ->
   Advertising and toggling Limit Ad Tracking to ‘ON’. Our systems are
   designed to respect your choice and not use information to provide IBA
   when this setting is ON. Again, you should consult Apple’s support web
   pages and instructions for the most current applicable settings.

Opting Out on Android Devices

   If you have an Android device and would like to opt out of our IBA
   services, you may do this as follows:

   1. Open the Google Settings app on your device

   2. Select Personal info & privacy à Ads settings à Manage Ad Settings

   3. Turn to “off” the “Ads based on your interests” option.

   Our systems are likewise designed to respect these choices transmitted
   by your Android device. Again, however, please consult Google’s
   settings and instructions for the most current settings information.

   Please note that these settings do not block ads, but rather will not
   base ads on your interests.

Data Storage and Security

   We retain the Non-PII collected via our Technology for up to eighteen
   months. After 18 months (or sooner) the data is stored in aggregate for
   up to three years.

   The security of your information is important to us. The Trade Desk has
   implemented security measures, including physical, electronic and
   administrative safeguards, to prevent the loss, misuse, and alteration
   of the information that our Technology collects, but we make no
   assurances about our ability to prevent such loss, misuse, to you or to
   any third party arising out of any such loss, misuse, or alteration.

Changes To Our Policy

   We may revise this policy at any time. Any changes and/or updates to
   the policy will be updated directly on this page. We encourage you to
   visit this page periodically to review our current privacy policy so
   that you will always know what information we gather and how we may use
   that information.

International Transfers, Safe Harbor and Privacy Shield

   The Trade Desk operates the Technology from servers located in the
   United States of America and the information it collects through
   Clients is processed in the United States of America. Laws governing
   the collection and use of data in the United States may not be
   equivalent to those in the country where you reside, but The Trade Desk
   will at all times protect your data in accordance with this Policy.

   To the extent they are applicable, The Trade Desk, Inc. complies with
   the principles of U.S./Swiss Safe Harbor Frameworks regarding Notice,
   Choice, Onward Transfer, Security, Data Integrity, Access and
   Enforcement with respect to the personal information it receives in the
   U.S. from Switzerland. To exercise their rights or file a complaint,
   residents of Switzerland may contact The Trade Desk, Inc. as described
   in the “Contact Us” section of this privacy policy, and our business
   customers can log into their accounts to directly access and correct
   certain information they have submitted. To learn more about the Safe
   Harbor Frameworks, please visit http://www.export.gov/safeharbor. You
   can search for and review our Safe Harbor certification at
   https://safeharbor.export.gov/list.aspx.

   If you have an unresolved privacy or data use concern that we have not
   addressed satisfactorily, please contact our U.S.-based third party
   dispute resolution provider (free of charge) at
   https://feedback-form.truste.com/watchdog/request.

   In connection with The Trade Desk, Inc.’s (“Company”) processing of
   personal data it receives from the EU (“EU Data”), Company adheres to
   the EU-U.S. Privacy Shield Framework Principles issued by the U.S.
   Department of Commerce (the “Principles”). For more information about
   the Principles, please visit the Department of Commerce’s Privacy
   Shield website, and for a list of participating companies, please visit
   the Department of Commerce's Privacy Shield List. Please be aware that
   in disclosure of information may be required in response to lawful
   requests by public authorities, for example to meet national security
   or law enforcement requirements.

   Please direct any inquiries or complaints regarding our compliance with
   the Principles to the point of contact listed in the “Contact Us”
   section below. If Company does not resolve your complaint, you may
   submit your complaint free of charge at
   https://feedback-form.truste.com/watchdog/request, Company’s designated
   Privacy Shield dispute resolution provider. Under certain conditions
   specified by the Principles, you may also be able to invoke binding
   arbitration to resolve your complaint, please click here for more
   information or to submit a compliant.Company is subject to the
   investigatory and enforcement powers of the FTC. If Company shares EU
   Data with a third-party service provider that processes the data solely
   on Company’s behalf, then Company will be liable for that third party’s
   processing of EU Data in violation of the Principles, unless Company
   can prove that it is not responsible for the event giving rise to the
   damage.

Contacting Us

   Should you have any questions in regards to this policy or The Trade
   Desk’s privacy practices, please contact our representatives at the
   following email and they will be more than happy to clarify and assist
   you in any way possible: [email protected], or by mail at:

   Privacy

   The Trade Desk, Inc.

   42 N. Chestnut Street

   Ventura, CA 93001

   PRIVACY PRACTICES FOR OUR WEBSITE

   Posted: September 30th, 2016, Effective Date: September 30th, 2016. For
   the prior versions of the privacy policy, please click here and here.

   This privacy policy describes how The Trade Desk collects and uses the
   personal informat ion you provide on our Web site, www.thetradedesk.com
   or otherwise to The Trade Desk through your contact with us, our
   employees and our contractors . It also describes the choices available
   to you regarding our use of your personally identifiable information
   (“PII”) and how you can access and update this information.

   If you have an unresolved privacy or data use concern that we have not
   addressed satisfactorily, please contact our U.S.-based third party
   dispute resolution provider (free of charge) at
   https://feedback-form.truste.com/watchdog/request.

   To the extent they are applicable, The Trade Desk, Inc. complies with
   the principles of the U.S./Swiss Safe Harbor Frameworks regarding
   Notice, Choice, Onward Transfer, Security, Data Integrity, Access and
   Enforcement with respect to the personal information it receives in the
   U.S. from Switzerland. To exercise their rights or file a complaint,
   residents of Switzerland may contact The Trade Desk, Inc. as described
   at the end of this privacy policy, and our business customers can log
   into their accounts to directly access and correct certain information
   they have submitted. In the event we are unable to resolve a
   disagreement with a covered European resident regarding the handling of
   his or her personal information under Safe Harbor, we agree to resolve
   the matter through the International Centre for Dispute Resolution /
   American Arbitration Association Safe Harbor Dispute Resolution Program
   (http://go.adr.org/safeharbor). To learn more about the Safe Harbor
   Frameworks, please visit http://www.export.gov/safeharbor. You can
   search for and review our Safe Harbor certification at
   https://safeharbor.export.gov/list.aspx.

   In connection with Company processing of personal data it receives from
   the EU (“EU Data”), Company adheres to the EU-U.S. Privacy Shield
   Framework Principles issued by the U.S. Department of Commerce (the
   “Principles”). For more information about the Principles, please visit
   the Department of Commerce’s Privacy Shield website, and for a list of
   participating companies, please visit the Department of Commerce's
   Privacy Shield List.Please be aware that in disclosure of information
   may be required in response to lawful requests by public authorities,
   for example to meet national security or law enforcement requirements.

   Please direct any inquiries or complaints regarding our compliance with
   the Principles to the point of contact listed in the “Contact Us”
   section below. If Company does not resolve your complaint, you may
   submit your complaint free of charge at
   https://feedback-form.truste.com/watchdog/request, Company’s designated
   Privacy Shield dispute resolution provider. Under certain conditions
   specified by the Principles, you may also be able to invoke binding
   arbitration to resolve your complaint, please click here for more
   information or to submit a compliant. Company is subject to the
   investigatory and enforcement powers of the FTC. If Company shares EU
   Data with a third-party service provider that processes the data solely
   on Company’s behalf, then Company will be liable for that third party’s
   processing of EU Data in violation of the Principles, unless Company
   can prove that it is not responsible for the event giving rise to the
   damage.

   Information We Collect On Our Website or from Other
   Contact

   We collect PII such as name, email address and phone number when you
   contact us with questions regarding our service or to request a
   demonstration of our product. You may also provide PII when you request
   a whitepaper, enter a contest or sweepstakes run by us, provide our
   employees with your business card, or provide information for billing
   and other business purposes.

   We and/or our selected third-party partners may also collect data about
   visitors’ activities on this Website and across the Internet over time
   for non-advertising purposes, including to conduct analytics, measure
   trends, and streamline website usability. Please see the section below
   on “Automatic Data Collection” for more information.

   How We Use Information We Collect On Our Website

   PII on this website is only collected on the Contact Us, Request a
   Demo, Get More Info, or Newsletter Signup sections. Information
   collected from whitepaper or contest submissions, or that you provide
   to an employee of TD, shall be used for the purposes disclosed at the
   time of collection, and may be used for marketing purposes relating to
   our products or services. Information collected for billing and related
   purposes shall be used for the purposes disclosed at the time of
   collection, as well as credit checks, invoicing, collection,
   troubleshooting, account maintenance, and other related business
   purposes.

Communications From The Site

   Newsletters

   If you wish to subscribe to our newsletter, we will use your email
   address to send the newsletter to you. If you no longer wish to receive
   these email communications you can follow the unsubscribe instructions
   contained in the emails you receive or by contacting us at
   [email protected]

   Service-related Announcements

   We will send you strictly service-related announcements on rare
   occasions when it is necessary to do so. For instance, if our service
   is temporarily suspended for maintenance, we might send you an email.

   Generally, you may not opt-out of these communications, which are not
   promotional in nature. If you do not wish to receive them, you have the
   option to deactivate your account.

Who We Share PII With

   We will share your personal information with third parties only in the
   ways that are described in this privacy statement.

   • We may provide your personal information to companies that provide
   services to help us with our business activities such as sending email
   communications on our behalf. These companies are authorized to use
   your personal information only as necessary to provide these services
   to us.

   • We may also disclose your personal information:

   o As required by law, such as to comply with a subpoena, or similar
   legal process,

   o When we believe in good faith that disclosure is necessary to protect
   our rights, protect your safety or the safety of others, investigate
   fraud, or respond to a government request,

   o If The Trade Desk is involved in a merger, acquisition, or sale of
   all or a portion of its assets, you will be notified via email and/or a
   prominent notice on our Web site of any change in ownership or uses of
   your personal information, as well as any choices you may have
   regarding your personal information, or

   o any other third party with your prior consent to do so.

Third Party Websites

   The Trade Desk Website may contain links to and advertisements for
   websites operated by third parties whose privacy practices may differ
   from ours. While we endeavor to associate only with reputable entities,
   The Trade Desk is not responsible for the privacy practices of these
   other websites. We encourage you to check the privacy policies of all
   websites that you visit.

Updating / Deleting your PII

   If you’d like us to update, correct, delete, or deactivate any PII that
   you have provided to us on this Website, please resubmit your contact
   information on the Contact Us page or send your request to us at
   [email protected] and we will process your request within 30 days of
   receiving it.

Data Retention

   We will retain your information for as long as your account is active
   or as needed to provide you services. We will retain and use your
   information as necessary to comply with our legal obligations, resolve
   disputes, and enforce our agreements.

Security

   The security of your personal information is important to us. The Trade
   Desk has implemented security measures to prevent the loss, misuse, and
   alteration of the information that our Technology collects, but we make
   no assurances about our ability to prevent such loss, misuse, to you or
   to any third party arising out of any such loss, misuse, or alteration.

Third Party Advertisers

   The Trade Desk follows the Digital Advertising Alliance Self-Regulatory
   Principles and the Network Advertising Initiative Code of Conduct. We
   may allow certain third parties to collect data about your web viewing
   behavior on The Trade Desk website and combine this data with
   information collected from other websites over time for purposes that
   include interest-based advertising. If you would like to learn more
   about this type of advertising, or would prefer to opt-out of
   interest-based advertising, U.S. residents may visit
   www.aboutads.info/choices or www.networkadverising.org/choices,
   European residents may visit www.youronlinechoices.com, and Canadian
   residents may visit http://youradchoices.ca/choices/. These websites
   allow you to opt-out of interest-based advertising by companies
   participating in these self-regulatory programs. To learn more about
   how to opt-out of interest-based advertising by The Trade Desk, please
   visit our Opt-Out Page.

Automatic Data Collection

   We and/or our selected third-party partners may also collect data about
   visitors’ activities on this Website and across the Internet over time
   for non-advertising purposes, including to conduct analytics, measure
   trends, and streamline website usability. The technologies used for
   this purpose may include log files, cookies, web beacons, and social
   media plug-ins as described below. One of the service providers we may
   use is Google Analytics. To learn more about how Google Analytics
   collects and processes data and the choices you may have to control
   these activities, you may visit
   http://www.google/com/intl/en/policies/privacy/partners/.

   Log Files

   As is true of most Web sites, we and our third party tracking-utility
   partner(s) may gather certain information automatically and store it in
   log files. This information includes internet protocol (IP) addresses,
   browser type, internet service provider (ISP), referring/exit pages,
   operating system, date/time stamp, and clickstream data.

   We use this information to analyze trends, to administer the site, to
   track users’ movements around the site and to gather demographic
   information about our user base as a whole.

   Cookies

   A cookie is a small text file that is stored on a user’s computer for
   record-keeping purposes. We use cookies on this site. We do link the
   information we store in cookies to any personally identifiable
   information you submit while on our site.

   You can remove persistent cookies by following directions provided in
   your Internet browser’s “help” file. If you reject cookies, you may
   still use our site, but your ability to use some areas of our site,
   such as contests or surveys, may be limited.

   The use of cookies by our partners and service providers is not covered
   by our privacy statement. We do not have access or control over these
   cookies.

   Clear Gifs

   Our third party partners or service providers may employ a software
   technology called clear gifs (a.k.a. Web Beacons/Web Bugs), that help
   us better manage content on our site by informing us what content is
   effective. Clear gifs are tiny graphics with a unique identifier,
   similar in function to cookies, and are used to track the online
   movements of Web users. In contrast to cookies, which are stored on a
   user’s computer hard drive, clear gifs are embedded invisibly on Web
   pages and are about the size of the period at the end of this sentence.
   We tie the information gathered by clear gifs to our customers’
   personally identifiable information.

   We use clear gifs in our HTML-based emails to let us know which emails
   have been opened by recipients. This allows us to gauge the
   effectiveness of certain communications and the effectiveness of our
   marketing campaigns.

   Social Media

   Our Web site includes Social Media Features, such as the Facebook Like
   button. These Features may collect your IP address, which page you are
   visiting on our site, and may set a cookie to enable the Feature to
   function properly. Social Media Features are either hosted by a third
   party or hosted directly on our Site. Your interactions with these
   Features are governed by the privacy policy of the company providing
   it. Please see above for more information on third-party advertising
   activities on our Site.

   California Do Not Track Disclosure

   Please note that The Trade Desk does not currently honor browsers’ DNT
   (do not track) settings.

Testimonials

   We post customer testimonials on our web site which may contain
   personally identifiable information. We obtain the customer’s consent
   via email prior to posting the testimonial to post their name along
   with their testimonial. If you want your testimonial removed please
   contact us at [email protected]

Changes To This Privacy Policy

   We may update this privacy policy to reflect changes to our information
   practices. We encourage you to periodically review this page for the
   latest information on our privacy practices.

Contact Us

   If you have any questions or suggestions regarding our privacy policy,
   please contact us at: 42 N. Chestnut Street, Ventura, CA 93001 or via
   email at [email protected]

   • FOLLOW ON TWITTER

   Top
     * About
     * Products
     * Insights
     * Careers
     * Trading Academy

   ©2019 The Trade Desk. All rights reserved. | Website Privacy Policy |
   Services Privacy Policy | Opt-Out
     * Facebook
     * Twitter
     * LinkedIn
     * Instagram
     * YouTube

   IAB Digital Advertising Alliance
   #alternate

   Skip to main content Menu
   The Trade Desk

     * About
          + Leadership
          + Partners
          + Press Releases
          + Industry Initiatives
          + Investor Relations
     * Products
          + Advertising Channels
          + Connected TV Advertising
          + Audio Advertising
          + Mobile Advertising
          + Native Advertising
          + Video Advertising
          + Planning & Buying Tools
          + Planner
          + Koa™ Artificial Intelligence
          + Data Management Platform
          + Cross-Device Targeting
          + Inventory & Marketplaces
          + Enterprise Solutions
          + Enterprise API™
     * Insights
          + All
          + Trends
          + Success Stories
          + Media Coverage
     * Careers
          + Jobs
     * Trading Academy

     * Contact Us
     * Log In

   ____________________ (BUTTON) Search
   English
     * 中文 (简体)

   ____________________ (BUTTON) Search

We’re transforming media for the benefit of humankind

   Learn More
   The Trade Desk: Media for Humankind

   Advertising — it’s what fuels the open internet and supports content
   creators, journalists, and the open exchange of information and ideas.
   We built our media-buying platform to power a more engaging and
   inspiring ecosystem for everyone.

   Our mission is to transform media for the benefit of humankind. How? By
   helping brands deliver a more insightful and relevant ad experience for
   consumers, and setting a new standard for global reach, accuracy, and
   transparency. Learn what makes us different.

Independence.

   We’re on the buy side. Which is everyone’s side. We never steer you
   toward our own media assets, because we don’t own any. It’s
   that simple.

Reach.

   One billion. That’s how many more people you can reach with The Trade
   Desk than with other major media-buying platforms.

Objectivity.

   We want you to spend your ad dollars where your data leads you. That
   allows for transparency in everything we do — from pricing and
   inventory to measurement and reporting.

Open.

   An open internet starts with an open platform. Which is why we built
   one. Our APIs are open too, so you get more value from your
   first-party data.

The whole of media should work for all of us, not just some of us.

   Learn More

Twitter

   Thank you @adweek for featuring our work and highlighting the purpose
   of our #mediaforhumankind campaign: https://t.co/SGsaL5tVaa
   September 24

   Clairvoyance allows Laura Taylor at @GoodwayGroup USA to understand how
   her team can use new technology to fit her… https://t.co/R2SJuk4dxH
   September 24

   Our brand campaign #MediaforHumankind is meant to describe the purpose
   of The Trade Desk. Our CMO @SusanVobejda sha… https://t.co/4AzqlioQ0V
   September 24

   RT @AdNews: Adtech The Trade Desk has released a new campaign, Media
   for Humankind, which aims to create a fairer and more transparent digi…
   September 24

Recent News

   August 22, 2019

Atom Tickets and The Trade Desk Partner to Provide Movie Marketers with
Ticket Sales Insights

   August 20, 2019

The Trade Desk Appoints Calvin Chan as General Manager, China

   August 13, 2019

PubMatic Reveals Significant Improvement Across Match Rates and Efficiency
from Adoption of The Trade Desk’s Unified ID Solution

   Top

     * About
     * Products
     * Insights
     * Careers
     * Trading Academy

   ©2019 The Trade Desk. All rights reserved. | Website Privacy Policy |
   Services Privacy Policy | Opt-Out
     * Facebook
     * Twitter
     * LinkedIn
     * Instagram
     * YouTube

   IAB Digital Advertising Alliance
   #alternate

   Skip to main content Menu
   The Trade Desk

     * About
          + Leadership
          + Partners
          + Press Releases
          + Industry Initiatives
          + Investor Relations
     * Products
          + Advertising Channels
          + Connected TV Advertising
          + Audio Advertising
          + Mobile Advertising
          + Native Advertising
          + Video Advertising
          + Planning & Buying Tools
          + Planner
          + Koa™ Artificial Intelligence
          + Data Management Platform
          + Cross-Device Targeting
          + Inventory & Marketplaces
          + Enterprise Solutions
          + Enterprise API™
     * Insights
          + All
          + Trends
          + Success Stories
          + Media Coverage
     * Careers
          + Jobs
     * Trading Academy

     * Contact Us
     * Log In

   ____________________ (BUTTON) Search
   English
     * 中文 (简体)
     * 日本語

   ____________________ (BUTTON) Search

We’re transforming media for the benefit of humankind

   Learn More
   The Trade Desk: Media for Humankind

   Advertising — it’s what fuels the open internet and supports content
   creators, journalists, and the open exchange of information and ideas.
   We built our media-buying platform to power a more engaging and
   inspiring ecosystem for everyone.

   Our mission is to transform media for the benefit of humankind. How? By
   helping brands deliver a more insightful and relevant ad experience for
   consumers, and setting a new standard for global reach, accuracy, and
   transparency. Learn what makes us different.

Independence.

   We’re on the buy side. Which is everyone’s side. We never steer you
   toward our own media assets, because we don’t own any. It’s
   that simple.

Reach.

   One billion. That’s how many more people you can reach with The Trade
   Desk than with other major media-buying platforms.

Objectivity.

   We want you to spend your ad dollars where your data leads you. That
   allows for transparency in everything we do — from pricing and
   inventory to measurement and reporting.

Open.

   An open internet starts with an open platform. Which is why we built
   one. Our APIs are open too, so you get more value from your
   first-party data.

The whole of media should work for all of us, not just some of us.

   Learn More

Twitter

   Our definitive guide to more strategic media buying is here! We're
   sharing three principles that help traders make…
   https://t.co/3FdIFj4Ku4
   November 18

   RT @UKOMAPS: Dave Castell @TheTradeDesk - "The ad-free subscription
   model favoured by many of the big players simply won’t generate the
   cap…
   November 18

   Audience Predictor, our lookalike modeling tool, identifies high-value
   audiences and builds a well-performing prosp… https://t.co/NpGWYcgtbj
   November 15

   RT @MMMagTweets: Most Brits won't pay more than £20 a month for TV
   streaming services, according to research from @TheTradeDesk
   https://t.…
   November 15

Recent News

   November 12, 2019

The Trade Desk Chief Financial Officer, Paul Ross, to Retire; Amazon’s Blake
Grayson Appointed as New CFO

   October 17, 2019

The Trade Desk Named a Best Medium Workplace by Great Place to Work® and
FORTUNE for the Third Year in a Row

   October 16, 2019

Brands, Agencies and Platforms Benefit from Increased Match Rates with
Tapad’s Integration of The Trade Desk’s Unified ID Solution

   Top

     * About
     * Products
     * Insights
     * Careers
     * Trading Academy

   ©2019 The Trade Desk. All rights reserved. | Website Privacy Policy |
   Services Privacy Policy | Opt-Out
     * Facebook
     * Twitter
     * LinkedIn
     * Instagram
     * YouTube

   IAB Digital Advertising Alliance
